Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
Number of Reviews
41

Author
Steve Rhodes
     There is a moment in GOOD WILL HUNTING when Will and Chuckie, a
couple of South Boston blue-collar buddies, go to a bar near Harvard.
Just as they get their kicks by brawling in their local neighborhood
with other Southies, they relish taking on the eggheads uptown.
     Chuckie spies Skylar, a good looking premed student at the bar.
Pretending he met her in a history class, he begins to put the moves on
her.  Spotting a charlatan, one of Skylar's fellow classmates begins
putting Chuckie down by spewing out a stream of hyperintellectual
questions for him.  To Chuckie's rescue comes Will with his
photographic memory and his incredible knowledge.  Like a prize
fighter, Will slings one fact after another at the Harvard student
until he is mentally beaten to a pulp.
     Actors Matt Damon and Ben Affleck, close friends together in real
life, play Will Hunting and Chuckie, but their largest contribution to
the picture is the marvelous script which they wrote together way back
in college.  They both grew up in South Boston, so the story possesses
an authenticity that many lack.  Always intelligent, usually moving,
frequently funny and subtlety emotional, the screenplay takes the story
of a hugely gifted individual into uncharted territory.
     Ben Affleck, who was so hilarious earlier this year in CHASING
AMY, plays a smaller and more serious role.  Matt Damon, who seemed
relatively lost in THE RAINMAKER, this time delivers a brilliant and
complex performance worthy of an Academy Award nomination.  Minnie
Driver from CIRCLE OF FRIENDS gives a touching performance as someone
who wants desperately to be loved by Will.
     As famous mathematics Professor Lambeau, Stellan Skarsgard from
BREAKING THE WAVES does a wonderful job in the part most easily
ignored.  It is Professor Lambeau who uncovers the identity of the
"mystery mathematician" who solves problems left on the board that
stump the faculty.  Will, who works as a janitor at MIT, has a
virtually unlimited mental capacity.  He can fire off solutions to
unsolvable problems as fast as he can shoot off his mouth or swing his
fists.
     With a rap sheet as long as the proverbial arm, Will finds himself
in jail.  The professor gets him out on condition that they work
together on some math problems and that Will go into counseling for his
uncontrollable temper.
     Since Will has no desire to see a shrink or to deal with his
anger, he blows off a series of psychologists.  In a sequence
reminiscent of a Woody Allen movie, the picture shows Will annihilating
the shrinks.  Finally, the professor turns to his old friend from
college, Sean McGuire, as his last chance.  In a performance worthy of
a nomination for best supporting actor, Robin Williams plays Sean.
Devoid of Robin's normal comic shtick, his acting reaches emotional
depths that he seldom displays.
     In one of the show's best scenes, a confrontation between Lambeau
and Sean, Lambeau argues for pushing Will to take a position in which
he can contribute to the world.  Arguing that the world is a better
place because an obscure 25 year old clerk in the Austrian patent
office, Albert Einstein, did not deny his gift, Lambeau claims that
Will should be encouraged to make something of his talents.  Sean
counters with another brilliant mathematician, Theodore Kaczynski, who
turned not into humanity's savior but into the Unabomber.
     Director Gus Van Sant Jr. (TO DIE FOR) reveals his own gift in the
movie's staging.  From an explosive first encounter between the two to
a bucolic scene at the lake where Sean lambastes Will for thinking that
all the world's knowledge can be found in books alone, Van Sant
delivers nothing short of gripping filmmaking.  Working closely with
his cinematographer, Jean-Yves Escoffier, they are as adept at the
scene shot from afar as the ones filmed in tight close-up.
     "Don't worry about me," Will tells Sean.  "I know what I'm doing."
Actually, Will is as incompetent in charting a course for his own
future as he is unbeatable when it comes to mathematics.  Sean, who had
a wife he adored, lost her two years ago after a long illness.  Still
wearing the scars of her death while loving his memories of their life
together, Sean has much to teach Will about life, but only if Will can
break his mental chains and listen.  Rather than being a distraction,
Sean's remorse dovetails nicely with Will's story of emotional
dysfunction.  "You do what's in your heart son," Will advises Sean once
he has broken through to him.  "You'll be fine."
     Although I would have preferred to see the film end 10 minutes
earlier than it does and leave the audience to fill in the story's
resolution, the ending does work quite well and mine would have
probably tested miserably.  GOOD WILL HUNTING accomplishes the rarely
obtained goal of creating a wide variety of intricate characters, all
worth caring about.
     GOOD WILL HUNTING runs 2:05.  It is rated R for profanity and
sexual humor and would be fine for teenagers.

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Matt Damon, Robin Williams, Ben Affleck, Stellan Skarsgard, Minnie
Driver, Casey Affleck, Cole Hauser
Director: Gus Van Sant
Producer: Lawrence Bender
Screenplay: Matt Damon and Ben Affleck
Although this movie is not the over the top, sensational, earth
shattering experience that I had expected it to be; it is so well
written and acted that one cannot criticise it for its otherwise minute
flaws.
Will Hunting (Matt Damon) is the man that all mediocre folk carrying
mundane jobs in order to maintain their otherwise ordinary lives wish to
be. He has the gift of superior intelligence (a modern day Einstein) but
works at a construction site, has multiple problems with the law and
does not have aspirations to be greater. Now that's gratitude for you!
Discovered by a Professor of Mathematics (Stellan Skarsgard), just
before being imprisoned for aggravated assault, Will Hunting must attend
several psychological counselling sessions a week with a community
psychologist (Robin Williams).
>From this basic story line the audience is lead through a journey of
events that must occur to improve Will Hunting's disposition. If the
movie had ended on a bad note, like that of a genius throwing his life
away, it would not be getting the good press it's receiving today. So
the focus rests on Will Hunting, not just his intelligence, but rather
the emotional turmoil of this extraordinary young man. In the same vein
as FORREST GUMP, WILL HUNTING carries the message that intelligence does
not make the better person. Great care is taken in discussing the issues
dealing with physical abuse, broken homes and self blame. Before finally
bringing about the predictable cathartic moment when self defence
mechanisms collapse like the Walls of Jericho. Include in this journey
an understanding, sympathetic girlfriend (Minnie Driver) who he
initially tries to push away. Then add timely confronting questions from
a genuinely interested therapist, who reinforces the technique with
fatherly affirmation and you have discovered the method used to rescue
Will Hunting from himself.
Matt Damon and Ben Affleck are the new kids on the block and this movie
is a major cornerstone in their budding careers. Be prepared to expect
much more from them in the future. Robin William's well controlled
interpretation of a psychological therapist is rightly up for Oscar
contention; as is Minnie Driver who is unlikely to win in her category.
Gus Van Sant will be overlooked in favour of the Cameron team, as shall
all other major contenders for Best Picture. Be overwhelmed by the
Titanic certainty on Oscar night. This movie will however receive best
original screenplay if that is any consolation.
Timothy Voon
e-mail: stirling@netlink.com.au
Movie Archives http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Tim+Voon
Hugues Bouclier's Movies in Melbourne
http://www.labyrinth.net.au/~bouclier/week/movies.html

Author
E. Benjamin Kelsey
Given the opportunity, I would much rather be a musical genius than a math
prodigy. Luckily, I stand a much better chance of that than the other. But as
Matt Damon's character Will Hunting explains, it's something that some people
might "just get". Beethoven looked at a piano and just understood it, Will
explains, and while he can't play a tune to save himself, when it comes to
complex mathematical equations, he just gets it.
Will grew up an orphan on the poorer side of Boston, living a life of abusive
foster parents and insecurity. On the verge of his 21st birthday, the closest
he's come to prestige is working as a janitor for the world-renowned MIT. He's
hot-tempered, he's cocky, he's sarcastic, and he's fearful of even the
slightest depths of intimacy, but behind all the obvious signs of a troubled
kid, Will has abilities very few of us possess. Example? How about solving
math problems that even learned scholars took two years to figure out, and
doing it in just one night?
MIT Professor Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgĺrd, most notably from BREAKING THE
WAVES) has been leaving these challenges on a chalkboard outside his classroom
so pupils can test themselves. Everyday, it appears that a mystery person has
solved the seemingly mind-boggling equation, but nobody is admitting to it,
and everybody, especially Lambeau, wonders who it could be. But one night
after hours, Lambeau discovers a foul-mouthed janitor writing on the board,
and is astonished when he realizes this is the genius he's been looking for.
Will isn't too interested in talking to the professor, but when he gets
arrested for assaulting an officer, it is the professor who bails him out. The
judge agrees to release Will into Lambeau's custody on one condition - Will
must develop his abilities with the professor and regularly meet with a
psychologist. Particulary reluctant to cooperate with the latter request, Will
taunts each and every psychologist Lambeau finds for him, and before we know
it, it is the psychologists who refuse to work with the smart-mouthed
virtuoso.
As a last resort, Lambeau approaches an old friend named Sean McGuire (Robin
Williams), a psychologist whose lesser accomplishments in life has led to an
awkward relationship with the highly-lauded professor. After losing his wife
to a long-illness, Sean seems to need some therapy of his own, which, along
with a similar childhood, helps him connect deeper with Will than anyone has
yet. After an abrasive beginning, the two develop a strong, silent fondness
for each other, and it is the exchanges between them that make this film such
a masterpiece. Williams, who has spent the last five years or so giving
impassioned performances in such mediocre films as JACK and FATHERS' DAY,
returns to acting brilliance with a performance that screams Oscar nomination.
The man who has played Mork the alien, Popeye the sailor-man, Genie the genie,
and even Peter Pan has reconfirmed something he demonstrated in DEAD POETS
SOCIETY and AWAKENINGS . . . he's an even better dramatic actor than comedic,
and we can only pray he dominates more roles like this in the future.
Other key characters include Will's best friend Chuckie, played by CHASING
AMY's Ben Affleck. Affleck and Damon are life-long buddies in real life, and
the two also wrote this Oscar-potential script. Affleck's role is actually
quite small, but his performance is commendable and shows why he'll be a
rising star in the next few years. Minnie Driver plays Will's Harvard student
love-interest, Skylar, a British babe who falls almost immediately in love
with the cocky but brilliant beau. The romance is by far the biggest flaw of
the film. It's quite underdeveloped, needing either more focus or a complete
deletion from the story. There is one scene where Will's fear of intimacy
results in a bitter argument between the two young lovers. It's a wonderfully
acted scene, but as great as it was, it could've packed ten times the
emotional impact had the relationship been more fully developed.  The romance
is also important because it provides for some of the year's best dialogue as
Will and Sean discuss love. Sadly, the movie would have suffered without the
love-story, but it also would've been too long had they used it like it needed
to be used.
Damon proves very impressive here, not only as an actor but as a writer. In
truly one of the best performances of the year, Damon is less likely to be
noticed here than in the more publicized JOHN GRISHAM'S THE RAINMAKER, but
this is still the role to see him in. Like Affleck, Damon is on his way to
well-deserved stardom, and if he continues as a writer, over the next few
years, he could prove to be one of the better talents Hollywood has to offer.
Director Gus Van Sant Jr. does a fine job handling this project, but with a
wonderful script and a near-perfect cast, it seems unlikely that a lesser
movie could've been made, even by a more gauche director. Jean-Yves
Escoffier's understated cinematography is sophisticated and artistic, and
Danny Elfman provides some nice musical pieces to accompany it. Skarsgĺrd's
performance as Professor Lambeau also deserves applause.
Coming in at the end of the year, GOOD WILL HUNTING is likely to make quite an
appearance at the Oscars and, hopefully, on critics' top ten lists for the
year. It jumped way up to number three on mine, only being surpassed by the
obvious TITANIC and the aforementioned Affleck film, CHASING AMY. While this
film deserves four-stars, it is not without a few mild imperfections, but, not
to repeat myself, the chemistry between Damon and Williams is enough to give
this the highest grade it can get. I would highly recommend this film to
everyone, but beware - this film is quite liberal in its use of the most
notorious four-letter word known to Hollywood. If you still don't know what I
mean, think of Joe Pesci. If you *still* don't know what I mean, you're
innocence is amazing, and this film would probably knock you for a loop. For
those of you who do understand, if this is something you can handle, or at
least get past, it will be well worth your effort.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Good Will Hunting (1997)
Matt Damon, Robin Williams, Ben Affleck, Minnie Driver, Stellan Skarsgard,
 Casey Affleck, Cole Hauser. Directed by Gus Van Sant. 125 minutes.
R, 4 stars (out of 5 stars)
Coming-of-age stories are almost always about men and there's a good 
reason for that. Despite all the hype about how far men have evolved from 
the old days, the truth is that most of us haven't. We've read about how 
contemporary men express their emotions instead of bottling everything up,
 but we don't quite know how to do that. So we still try to be tough, yet 
accessible; stoic and cool. We strive to live up to some vague male ideal 
that probably never existed, and we feel like frauds. Coming-of-age films 
are invaluable because they give us a chance to vicariously grow up all 
over again. 
Which brings us to "Good Will Hunting," a rich, rewarding coming-of-age 
tale starring Will Damon and Robin Williams. The screenplay, written by 
Damon and his co-star and boyhood friend Ben Affleck ("Chasing Amy," 
"Going All The Way",) is reminiscent of other male-bonding films, notably 
"Ordinary People" and "Dead Poets Society," but quite emotionally 
satisfying in its own right. Their portrait of a lost young man whose 
unresolved pain triggers explosive outbursts, and the two father figures 
who battle over his soul, hits all the right notes. Under the assured 
hand of director Gus Van Sant ("My Own Private Idaho," "Drugstore 
Cowboys") even the maudlin parts of the story retain an emotional clarity.
 Like "Hoosiers," "Good Will Hunting" takes a well-worn theme and makes 
it seem fresh, thanks to exceptional acting and solid, three-dimensional 
storytelling.  
Will Hunting (Damon) is a scrappy young tough from South Boston's Irish 
ghetto who works as a janitor at a prestigious university. A mathematical 
genius with a photographic memory, Hunting has no direction, spending his 
time pounding beer and exchanging mock insults with his buddies, 
particularly his best friend Chuckie (Affleck.) When MIT Professor 
Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgard from "Breaking The Waves") spots the boy 
casually solving an advanced math problem, he pursues Hunting, only to 
find him jailed for assaulting a police officer. Lambeau arranges to take 
the troubled kid under his wing, with two conditions. Hunting must do 
math work with the professor and agree to participate in therapy for his 
antisocial behaviors. Following several disastrous attempts to match the 
boy with a therapist, Lambeau finally turns to Sean McGuire (Williams,) a 
psychology professor at a small community college. McGuire, who grew up 
in the same neighborhood as Hunting, tries to help the boy confront his 
inner demons, only to find his own painful memories stirred up as well. 
Further complicating matters is Hunting's awkward courtship of Skylar 
(Minnie Driver,) a wealthy Harvard senior preparing for medical school.
For men seeking to vicariously relive their adolescence, Will Hunting is 
the perfect flawed hero. Rakishly handsome and as fast with his tongue as 
he is with his fists, Hunting has limitless potential, if he can only 
break through his own emotional barriers. To make the wish-fulfillment 
scenario complete, he is surrounded by a support system most people only 
dream of; a group of loving, encouraging pals, a smart, charming 
girlfriend, and two, count 'em, two father figures trying to help the kid 
better himself. In lesser hands, this material could have been unbearably 
mawkish, but thankfully, Damon and Affleck's script balances the angst 
with loads of earthy humor to keep the proceedings grounded. That, 
coupled with Van Sant's confident direction and some powerhouse acting, 
helps "Good Will Hunting" to pay off in grand fashion. 
Matt Damon, who made quite an impression in "The Rainmaker," gives a 
breakthrough performance here. Possessed with tousled good looks and a 
killer smile, the charismatic actor is utterly convincing as a super-
intellect, while maintaining the character's working-class sensibilities. 
He's really quite remarkable here. Robin Williams does admirable work as 
well, showing what a fine actor he can be when he restrains himself. As 
the wounded professor, Williams projects great strength and defiance, 
tempered by a gentle, caring nature. The chemistry that slowly builds 
between him and Damon is electrifying.
As Skylar, Minnie Driver has an earthy charm that comes from her 
willingness to completely let down her guard. Whether telling a dirty 
joke to the guys at a bar, or breaking into tears in the darkness, she 
possesses a bracing sense of honesty. It's easy to understand why Hunting 
is drawn to her.
Also good are Skarsgard as the driven math professor and Affleck as 
Hunting's closest friend. In fact, there isn't a bad performance to be 
found in the film. The strong acting, along with Van Sant's ability to 
make the South Boston setting feel authentic, allows "Good Will Hunting" 
to triumph over its occasional moments of excess sentimentality. Cynics 
may dismiss the film as an overly effusive festival of male-bonding, but 
for the rest of us, this is just the catharsis we need.

Author
Sridhar Prasad
    One of the most stunning pictures of 1997, "GOOD WILL HUNTING"
emerged from winter season as one of the best films of the year, and a
blockbuster hit for Miramax.  Featuring a hip, young cast, and a
wonderful role by Robin Williams, "GWH" was rewarded with 2 Oscar
victories, including Best Original Screenplay, and Best Supporting
Actor, for Williams.
The plot is relatively simple and straightforward.  Will Hunting
(Damon) is the classic definition of a rebel.  Born and raised in
South Boston by foster parents, Will is a fighter, a kid of the
streets, who gets into fights without being asked, who bums around
bars with his friends, having a few drinks between jobs.  Will is also
a genius.  His mind is brilliant, and he has the education of a
Harvard student, without the degree.
His secret is discovered when one day, he is caught by Professor
Gerald Lambeau (Skaarsgard) while working on a complex Fourier system
Lambeau had put up on a blackboard as a challenge to his students.
Lambeau immediately "rescues" the boy from an impeding jail term, and
takes him to a number of therapists to heal his mind.  Finally, he
asks college roommate Sean McGuire (Williams), himself a Southie as
well, to help the boy.  What follows is a journey for Will and Sean,
as both grow closer during the sessions.  The story also deals with
Will's development, his love for Skylar (Driver), and his complicated
friendship with Chuckie (Affleck).
The screenplay is riddled with old movie cliches, and is as
predictable as any other.  What sets "GOOD WILL HUNTING" apart,
however, is the direction of Gus Van Sant, as well as the acting of
the principal roles.  Van Sant uses all sorts of angles and lighting
to acheive brilliant technical shots while drawing the audience into
the story.  While the story may be flawed, the dialogue certainly
isn't.  Damon and Affleck wrote an endearing script, one which rewards
excellent performances with great pieces of dialogue, and fantastic
set pieces.
The performances are nothing short of exquisite.  Damon and
Affleck are wonderful, absolutely wonderful.  Driver is sweet and
touching, and Skaarsgard is as good as ever.  But the film belongs to
Williams' tortured performance as McGuire.  It is his story that is
told as well, his change from sorrow to relief.  The script tracks a
parallel story in Sean McGuire's, and Williams pours more into this
performance than any other in recent memory.  Damon is nothing short
of outstanding in his lead role, but Williams just steals every shot
he has.  With a wonderful score and a gorgeous ending, this film is
certainly one of the finest of 1997, and a stunning debut for
screenwriters Damon and Affleck.

Author
Stian M. Landgaard
GOOD WILL HUNTING (Be Gentlemen Limited Partnership / Lawrence Bender
Productions / Miramax Films)
GOOD WILL HUNTING was to me a very warm-hearted, intelligent and
well-conceived story of a 20-year-old boy, Will Hunting (Damon), whose
skills in mathematics and general science are tremendous. He suffers
from a difficult childhood, and together with his friends, he has been 
involved in robberies, fighting, and vandalism. A mathematics 
professor, Gerald Lambeau (Skarsgĺrd), discovers Will's abilities,
and attempts to make use of him in his mathematical research. But
upon realizing that Will is uncooperative and difficult to handle,
professor Lambeau persuades Will to see a therapist, Sean Maguire
(Williams), who was Lambeau's room-mate in college.
Throughout the rest of the movie we follow the growing friendship
between Will and Sean, and Will's new-found love, Skylar (Driver).
Will Hunting must understand who he really is, and attempt to
deal with his past. Only then might he be ready to face the future ...
Ben Affleck (starring Will's friend Chuckie) and Matt Damon has
written a very impressive screenplay, and I was not surprised
that they snatched an Academy Award for it. Although the story is
somewhat predictable (several times we know what the next move will
be), I find it charming and quite good. The ending might be a bit
slow, but it's surprising and lovely. Robin Williams shows once and
for all that he can do drama roles, and Matt Damon is very convincing
as Will Hunting. Even the Swedish actor, Skarsgĺrd, seems to do well
in Hollywood pictures. His role is very basic and unemotional but
not cardboard-like. Generally speaking, all the actors did their part,
and brought the movie to a place among the best of 1997.
Reviewed by Stian M. Landgaard, April 12th, 1998

Author
Chad Polenz
Chad'z rating: **** (out of 4 = excellent)
1997, R, 126 minutes [2 hours, 6 minutes]
starring: Matt Damon (Will Hunting), Robin Williams (Prof. Sean Maguire),
 Stellan Skasgĺrd (Prof. Gerald Lambeau), Ben Affleck (Chuckie); written by
 Matt Damon, Ben Affleck; produced by Lawrence Bender; directed by Gus Van
 Sant.
Seen March 18, 1998 at 7 p.m. at Rotterdam Square Mall (Rotterdam, NY),
 theater #3, by myself using my Sony/Loews critic's pass. [Theater rating: ***:
 good sound, picture, and seats]
        Most genres use story as a device, backdrop, or a conveince, but drama is a
 genre all about story and is just as likely to suffer from problems that
 hinder the storytelling process (i.e. predictability, question of
 plausibility, etc.) as anything else. Perhaps the reason drama gets a bad rap
 is due to our concentration on these elements where we might not notice them
 otherwise. In its most basic form, "Good Will Hunting" is as classic a drama
 as they come, but like its hero, it manages to exceed well beyond the
 standards to the point where it creates new ones. It isn't just  a
 surprisingly enjoyable drama, it IS drama.
        The film opens by introducing us to Will Hunting (Damon), a suave young man
 who holds a custodial position at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.
 Looking at him one could never tell (or even believe, for that matter) that he
 is actually an orphan, a criminal, and a born genus. Thankfully, these aspects
 are put on the back burner for the sake of character development, which makes
 them all the more relevant later.
         Will likes to do things any another college-aged guy in a big city would do,
 such as hit the bars and clubs with his friends and mingle with the ladies.
 The initial atmosphere and dialogue is very realistic as the performances,
 combined with the terrific directing create for the kind of authentic
 camaraderie most films only try for. The delicate pacing allows us to learn
 things about Will by carefully dropping hints at the right moments without
 rushing anything. In fact, some elements are purposely left open-ended and
 contain little explanation, such as a scene in which Will and his best friend
 Chuckie (Affleck) attempt to beat up some guys over an elementary grudge. When
 Will is arrested he is freed with help from Gerald Lambeau (Skasgĺrd) - an MIT
 professor who has realized Will's hidden talent and wants to help him.
        Part of Lambeau's plea bargain with the judge is that Will must undergo
 therapy, but when a few confrontations with psychiatrists go bad, Lambeau
 finally finds the perfect shrink - his old college friend Sean Maguire
 (Williams). Here is where the film begins to prove its merit even as the story
 works as expected. Will is a good kid at heart, but he has a tremendous
 problem with authority, but only Maguire is able to get past his violent
 temper and feel the ability (and need) to help him. Within just a few minutes
 time both men are able to analyze each other: Will because he is a genus, and
 Maguire because he's a psychologist. The process by which this occurs is
 nothing short of amazing, especially considering how quickly it happens
 without becoming the least bit trite. 
        And if the film hadn't already established itself as a power character-driven
 drama, it manages to top itself as the story continues to expand. It's not
 surprising that Will meets a girl (Minnie Driver as Skyla), but what is
 surprising is the way in which the relationship works in conjunction with the
 various sub-plots. Damon and Driver have great chemistry together, and the
 screenplay allows them to be more than simply generic lovers, but as two
 intelligent people who genuinely care for each other. Will discusses the
 relationship with Maguire, whose analysis is fascinating as he draws parallels
 to his relationship with his now-deceased wife and thus provides for good
 character development and interaction.
        Although the film is comprised of various highly intellectual elements,
 intelligence without application is a pretty boring thing. Affleck and Damon
 realize this and have managed to chisel their script with the tiniest details
 of insight. The characters are so likable because we're allowed to learn what
 makes them tick - they're not simply people involved in conflicts for the sake
 of a Hollywood drama. And when Will and Skyla's romance becomes troubled it
 seems realistic as it isn't used as a gimmick.
        A countless number of minor topics come up and are dealt with accordingly,
 such as Will refusing to take a government job because of the harm it might do
 to people he doesn't know, or how his job as a construction worker is more
 honorable than a mathematician. Many idiosyncratic observations are also made,
 mostly through common dialogue, all of which continue to demonstrate the
 film's remarkable insight into everything it deals with.
        What's great about a film like "Good Will Hunting" is that within the course
 of a couple of hours it manages to deal with some of the heaviest subjects of
 life and always in the greatest of ways. It's emotionally powerful and an
 example of great story-telling. If there's any justice it will become a modern
 classic.
Please visit Chad'z Movie Page @ http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz - over 190
 new and old films reviewed in depth, not just blind ratings and quick
 capsules. Also, check out The FIRST Shay Astar Web Page @
 http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz/ShayAstar.html

Author
Jerry Saravia
Films about child prodigies or twentysomething geniuses rarely get inside their
heads and ask: "What makes you tick?" An even tougher question rarely posed is:
"How do you deal with who you are?" Slight films in this category that could
have been great include Jodie Foster's "Little Man Tate," and the predictable
Rocky-crossed-with-chess-playing tale "Searching For Bobby Fischer." There's
also the finely acted "Stand and Deliver" that dealt with inner-city kids who
miraculously performed better in A.P. Calculus exams than anyone else, but they
didn't exist as anything more than ciphers. One film that broke through that
barrier was the marvelous "Amadeus," which depicted the rare talents of the
wonderful composer Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart in blazing glory with, naturally,
great music to alleviate the senses. The Oscar-winning film was a
three-dimensional portrait of Mozart presenting him as a buffoonish clown who
didn't seem arrogant, but knew how good a composer he was. Now there is also
"Good Will Hunting," a finely acted, well-written drama about a math genius who
is too good to be true, and that is part of the film's problem. 
The charismatic Matt Damon stars as the conceited orphan Will Hunting; a South
Bostonian hooligan who drinks, fights, and generally fools around with his
buddies. He works as a janitor at MIT and, once in a while, he solves complex
math problems posed by an MIT professor (Stellan Skarsgard) on a hallway
blackboard. When the professor finally spots him solving a problem, he decides
to use Will as a math instructor to solve all kinds of difficult math theorems
that had conflicted scientists for centuries. Will is reluctant at first, but
he decides to go along with it since it is way of avoiding jail time. It also
means that he has to see a brilliant therapist (Robin Williams) twice a week -
a former child prodigy who will try to uncover what makes this troubled kid
tick. 
Will has the ability to see through people - he can make Harvard students
envious with his textbook knowledge of politics, and he can drive people mad
with aggravation, including the therapist who Will discovers is a widower. Lest
anyone think that he's just a brainiac, Will also has the ability to love,
especially a British Harvard student (Minnie Driver) who wants to help him
grapple with his emotions. There's a priceless scene where he picks up Minnie
at a bar. She asks if they could get together for coffee. He suggests caramels:
"When you think about it, it is as arbitrary as drinking coffee." 
"Good Will Hunting" has a terrific premise - a troubled genius who suppresses
his past - and although the film deals with his abusive past, it never confirms
or explains Will's genius. Where does it stem from and, more importantly, how
does Will feel about his own intelligence? The movie treats Will as a
misunderstood genius rather than allowing Will to see how he mistreats and
misunderstands himself. That's probably too much to expect from a film, but I
wouldn't have minded to see Will's brain at work - how about a scene where we
see the mental process by which Will solves a math problem? There are some
instances where we see Will's genius at work (the courtroom scenes where Will
avoids misdemeanor jail sentences by quoting legal cases from the 19th century
is a good example) but they are not enough to show how Will's mind unravels.
Mostly, we see the selfish MIT professor trying to use Will's mind as an
experiment for his own ambitions, and there's the therapist who is trying to
get Will to confront his past - yes, you've seen these subplots before. 
"Good Will Hunting" has plenty of expert performances from the cast, including
Matt Damon ("Courage Under Fire") as the fast-talking Will; Ben Affleck
("Chasing Amy") as Will's beer-drinking buddy who has a pivotal moment where he
tries to convince Will to take advantage of his talents; the luscious Minnie
Driver as Will's girlfriend who loves him; and the grand Robin Williams as the
hip therapist who has been down the same road as Will. Williams, in his
Awakenings mode, is brilliantly understated and a joy to watch as we see him
gradually trying to get Will to open his heart. His final scene, where he
repeatedly acknowledges to Will that it is "not your fault," is emotionally
powerful and heartbreaking. 
"Good Will Hunting" is competently directed by Gus Van Sant ("Drugstore
Cowboy"), but he never gets as close to Will's nature as he did to River
Phoenix's in "My Own Private Idaho." The first-time screenplay by co-stars Ben
Affleck and Matt Damon is often smartly funny, manipulative and
quasi-sentimental but not as freshly developed as I might have hoped. By the
end of the film, you feel that Will Hunting is more like an unreal movie
character than a genuine, three-dimensional human being. 
For more review, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me at jerry@movieluver.com or Faust667@aol.com for any suggestions,
comments or complaints. 

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: Gus Van Sant
Cast: Matt Damon, Robin Williams, Ben Affleck, Minnie Driver, Stellan
Skarsgard
Rated R: Strong language, some violence
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    Where the heck did Matt Damon come from? A few months ago I hadn't
even heard of him, let alone seen his face. When I saw The Rainmaker, I
was impressed with his obvious talents as an actor. Now here's Good Will
Hunting, which he stars in and co-wrote with his real-life friend Ben
Affleck (who co-stars as well), and it's a terrific film. It's a
thoughtful, extremely well-written (albeit not entirely original) story
that manages to take hold of the audience on multiple levels. I
thoroughly enjoyed it from start to finish, but it surpassed simple
entertainment--it's a direct, honest story that made me think and left
me uplifted.
    Damon plays the title character, Will Hunting, a cocky boy genius
who has grown up in various foster families. His life has been anything
but easy--aside from the frequent beatings he got from his foster
parents, he was constantly in trouble with the law, and his only form of
education came with his own initiative to continually read books of all
kinds. At the time of the film, he is working as a janitor on the
Harvard campus. One night he covertly solves a difficult proof posted by
math professor Dr. Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgard); shortly after, he is
arrested for assault and battery. Lambeau bails him out of jail, but the
judge rules that he must remain under the supervision of Lambeau (which
involves helping with difficult math concepts), and that he must see a
psychiatrist.
    The first part is easy; Will finds any form of math to be a breeze,
so much that he puts Lambeau and many other accomplished mathematicians
to shame with his effortless talent. Finding a psychiatrist, however,
tends to be more difficult--it takes four failed attempts with various
doctors before Lambeau goes to an old college friend, Sean McGuire
(Robin Williams), who agrees to see Will because of the challenge Will
presents.
    Will is anything but a cooperative individual. To describe him as
arrogant and smug would be an understatement--this kid thinks he knows
everything. He judges people after thirty seconds of contact, and
doesn't use the slightest hint of tact or politeness in most situations.
He makes the mistake of assuming too much about Sean, who quickly puts
Will in his place. Will also meets a young British student named Skylar
(Minnie Driver) who teaches him a little about love and relationships
with women.
    Good Will Hunting is primarily a success because of it's honesty.
The director, Gus Van Sant, doesn't distance us with a lot of arty fluff
(which never works in dramas of this kind). He uses a lot of still
camera work, with long takes and slow panning (note the scene on the
lake in which Sean calmly tells Will that he doesn't know anything); the
result is often mesmerizing, and it allows a direct line for the
audience to understand the characters without a lot of nonsense getting
in the way. The script, ornamented with sharp dialogue and great scenes,
only accentuates the ease with which we can understand these people.
    Equally important are the performances, all of which are dead-on for
the mood of the film. Damon is astonishing--easily one of the best
performances from a young actor in recent years. He gives Will a great
energetic quality, something that tells us that there is a nice guy
hidden behind those cocky eyes of his. Driver, sporting her natural
British accent, is down-to-earth and very appealing; and Ben Affleck,
who plays Will's close friend Chuckie, is much more believable than I
would have expected after seeing Chasing Amy. Skarsgard proves vast
diversity in his exceptional talents, for this mathematician couldn't be
more dissimilar from the paraplegic oil worker he portrayed in Breaking
the Waves.
    As good as all of these performances are, none of them can touch
Robin Williams--although he is clearly under a great deal of restraint
here, this performance is quite possibly his best. I've never been a
huge Williams fan; films that he often does, like Mrs. Doubtfire and
recently Flubber, tend to grate on my nerves, but when he goes dramatic,
there is something special about his conduct. The thought of him
grappling Will's neck and hissing, "I will end you!" with intense rage
sends shivers down my spine. Sean is a tortured individual, and Williams
makes these levels obvious with very little dialogue. He has my vote for
best supporting actor this year.
    I love watching films that obviously come from the heart. Damon,
Affleck, Van Sant, and the rest of the people involved weren't
interested in the money or the business or anything like that. They
wanted to make an straightforward, touching film. Their effort was not
in vain--Good Will Hunting is a great movie, one that gets to the point
and treats its audience with a little respect. I, for one, will be
eagerly awaiting Damon's next project.

Author
Chris Webb
CAST: Matt Damon, Robin Williams, Stellan Skarsgard, Ben Affleck, Minnie 
      Driver, Casey Affleck, Cole Hauser  
      Directed by Gus Van Sant
        "Good Will Hunting" is one film that had caused me to reevaluate 
where my life is going and how I am doing it.  Perhaps because I have 
friends and conversations like these back home, and I have dealt with a 
similar struggle between picking my future and holding onto what is 
comfortable.  For whatever reason, I could relate to this film.  While 
many will sympathize with the characters and enjoy the story, young guys 
who have not had the world handed to them will benefit from seeing "Good 
Will Hunting."
        Twenty-year-old genius, Will Hunting (Matt Damon), lives in South 
Boston working construction and as a janitor at MIT.  He solves the 
problems left on a hallway chalkboard by professor Gerald Lambeau (Stellan 
Skarsgaard), an internationally acclaimed mathematician.  Will does this 
anonymously, not wanting any part of the world of academia.  He would 
rather spend time with his friend, bar-hopping and driving aimlessly, 
running up an unbelievable rap sheet.  Lambeau takes time to seek Will 
out, only to discover him in jail for hitting a police officer.  Will can 
be free if he agrees to work with Lambeau in higher math and to undergo 
therapy.  The film hits full speed once Sean Maguire (Robin Williams) 
agrees to take on Will as a patient.
        Themes that run through "Good Will Hunting" are layered. The 
nature of genius, class conflict, and the complexities of love and trust 
are all explored, not focusing solely on Will.  Maguire and Lambeau old 
roommates took different paths after MIT.  Maguire will not attend 
reunions, looked on as a sellout for leaving the upper echelon of the 
academy to teach in a Boston community college, finding his true love in 
the process.  Lambeau, all awards and success, with little personal 
fulfillment, resents that Maguire was "smarter than me then, and smarter 
than me now."  They argue about whether Will should follow his heart or 
his brain, while Will himself becomes lost in their bickering.
        The screenplay was written by Damon and best friend Ben Affleck, 
who plays best friend Chuckie.  They have deservedly won a Golden Globe 
for best screenplay and have jumped to the A-list of actors, after seeing 
smaller roles in the past.  Affleck was found in this year's "Chasing 
Amy," for better or worse, and Damon has charged out with simultaneous 
roles in this and "The Rainmaker."  He opened eyes in 1996's "Courage 
Under Fire" as a Gulf War vet turned heroin addict.
        Robin Williams, gifted comedian, but better onscreen in dramas, 
has pulled himself out of purgatory after the disastrous "Fathers' Day" 
and "Flubber."  With a character most akin to his teacher in "Dead 
Poet's Society," he serves as the mentor for Will in a cynical world.   
        Skarsgaard, a Swede recently landing English-speaking roles with 
this and 1996's "Breaking the Waves" is excellent as the professor who 
all-too-keenly recognizes his limitations.  Minnie Driver performs well 
as a sheltered, wealthy college girl who turns into an emotional wreck as 
her relationship with Will becomes deeper.
        Before attending "Good Will Hunting" the first time (three times 
total), my father pointed out that this was the film that reduced most 
guys to tears.  A late scene between Damon and Williams will tug at you 
emotionally, and is reminiscent of an exchange between Judd Hirsch and 
Timothy Hutton in "Ordinary People."  Both received Oscar nominations, 
with hutton winning as a supporting actor.  "Good Will Hunting" is 
expected to garner its own slew of nominations, while the principals 
should get one.  This could be Williams' year, as this character is the 
deepest one he has portrayed to date.
        "Good Will Hunting" deeply affected me, for while I could not 
identify with all the struggles, I have had my share of run-ins with 
people.  Freshman year I was told by a student here to ignore my friends 
from home if I wanted to make it.  When Will is reminded by a 
pseudo-intellectual Harvard student that he will be serving his kids 
burgers, he responds, "That may be so, but at least I won't be 
unoriginal."  Neither is this movie.  It does not get caught up within 
itself the way most against-the-odds films do, and that is why this film 
will be one of the most fulfilling experiences you could have.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
   Sure, America has no kings or queens, but social classes
are alive and well.  The conflicts between the circles provide
abundant material for both drama and comedy: "Good Will
Hunting," Gus Van Sant's surprisingly conventional
psychological piece, supplies both.  Despite its schematic
layout and predictable outcome, the ensemble acting is of
such a high level--particularly that of Robin Williams, Matt
Damon and Stellan Skarsgard--that the impact on his
audience is spellbinding.  "Good Will Hunting," whose title is
evoked from its main character and its theme alike, treats a
subject exploited by Robert Redford in "Ordinary People,"
doing so with explosively funny one-liners and effectively
poignant moments.  
   A commonly-held view is that geniuses just cannot fit
in...their ability to see what few others can casts them into
nether regions of research and academe where they toil
away, intellectually satisfied but emotionally starved. The title
figure of Van Sant's latest feature does not quite correspond
to this stereotype. He is certainly not challenged intellectually
since he has no discovered a problem he cannot easily solve,
nor does he strive to find a career worthy of his gifts. 
Emotionally, he erects walls, refusing to let anyone in for fear
of finding himself less than perfect and invulnerable.  The task
of the two adults who change his life and the peers who love
him, of course, is to shatter this wall, to reach this twenty-
year-old prodigy, and send him off to a future which will not
necessarily be a rose garden but which opens him up to
those aspects of life he dare not confront.  In "Good Will
Hunting" Van Sant, fully realizing a wise-guy screenplay
written by two of his young performers, steers clear of oddball
themes he evoked in "To Die For" and "My Own Private
Idaho" and "Drugstore Cowboy," compensating by a drama
rich in sharp dialogue and exceptionally strong performances.
   The story deals with Will (Matt Damon), a tough orphan
brought up in the South Bronx, who has been abused by his
drunken stepfather and thereby never exposed to the
possibility of a higher education.  An avid reader with a
photographic mind, however, he has far more book
knowledge in math, history, politics, art and literature than any
of the students he encounters at Harvard and MIT, two of the
country's premier universities.  When he is not polishing the
hallways of MIT at a job he was assigned by a parole officer
(he is imprisoned for assaulting a policeman), he is either
solving mathematical problems anonymously or hanging out in
pubs with his rugged pals, especially Chuckie (Ben Affleck). 
When an award-winning math professor, Lambeau (Stellan
Skarsgard) discovers the youth's ability to solve math
problems that even he cannot work out, he gets the young
man out of jail and puts him in the hands of psychology
professor Sean McGuire (Robin Williams) at a small,
obviously mediocre community college.  Though other
analysts have been unable to reach Will, Sean gets through,
presumably because he is himself damaged goods--having
failed to make use of his abilities to achieve the honors
received by his former classmate, Lambeau, and unable to
get over the painful death of his wife.  What's more, Sean
seems smothered by an envy of his more successful
classmate who teaches at the country's most prestigous
technical college.
   Two monologues in the film are nothing short of dazzling:
one, delivered by Sean while he and his patient are sitting
around a pond, is built on the psychologist's refusal to see the
boy's life as exceptional.  The lad, according to Sean, will
quote a Shakespearean sonnet but has probably never loved,
can discuss the politics of war but has never held the head of
a wounded friend on the battlefield, can discuss world affairs
but has never in his life left Boston.  The other is a leftist
lecture which Will lays on to some officials in the National
Security Administration, an organization seven times the size
of the CIA, which is trying to recruit him to break codes.  Will
sees the job as one which will help the organization exploit
people in other lands who "make fifteen cents a day," and
which will result in American bombardment over foreign
territories to insure the even flow of oil to the U.S.
   Much of this edgy drama is so riveting that it is actually a
shame that a romantic theme has been jackknifed into the
story, one which halts the tale's momentum and helps provide
for an all-too-neat conclusion.  The courtship involved Will
with a rich Harvard senior, Skylar (Minnie Driver), who is
bound for medical school and has fallen in love with this
genius who is of a vastly different social class.  
  Filmed largely on location in Boston, the movie will do
wonder for the budding career of Matt Damon, who succeeds
admirably in maintaining a New England accept throughout
and who, by sharing in the writing of the script, proves to be a
man of great talent not unlike the character he plays.  His
chemistry with Robin Williams is visceral: Van Sant builds up
the relationship in steps, taking Will Hunting from a hopelessly
resistant analysand who in one session says not a word to a
kid who breaks down in tears by his final session. 
Photographer Jean Yves Escoffier does wonder with the
working-class, South Boston neighborhood, filming a rowdy
fight with alarming realism and subtly providing a few key
flashbacks to underscore the backgrounds of Will and Sean.
Rated R.  Running Time: 126 minutes.  (C) 1997
Hollywood Hotline

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     Frankly, the film did not do a lot for me.  I could not believe
the mail character.  Goethe was one of the great geniuses in history
and he excelled, as opposed to just being good, in only a few fields.
The premise of GOOD WILL HUNTING bothered me from the very beginning
because it was too difficult to believe that Will Hunting could be as
brilliant in as many different fields as the script requires him to be.
To have a super-genius of his caliber places this film more in the
category of science fiction than that of a believable drama.  The
premise that there is someone out there of this magnitude of brilliance
who has not by the age of 20 come to a lot of people's attention seems
unlikely.  Here he is working as a custodian at MIT and he can easily
beat the best mathematics professors on the faculty.  Then he
demonstrates he is way ahead of an economics graduate student in that
student's own field.  This would be hard to believe of someone who
spends his full time studying, but Will Hunting (played by Mark Damon)
seems to spend very little time in books.  Instead he spends most of
his spare time drinking with his blue-collar buddies and getting into
trouble with the law.
     His real genius is discovered by mathematics Professor Lambeau
(Stallan Skarsgard), winner of the Fields Medal (the most prestigious
award in mathematics).  Lambeau gives his classes a prize problem to
see if one person can get it over the semester.  Janitor Will Hunting
solves it with the effort of doing the Times Crossword Puzzle and
leaves the answer anonymously on a hallway blackboard.
     Lambeau sets a harder problem and Hunting solves it also, but is
seen leaving the answer.  This gives Lambeau the clue needed to track
down the mysterious genius whom he finds conducting his own legal
defense after having attacked a police officer.  Hunting fails to
convince the judge and is sentenced to jail. Lambeau arranges a parole
on two conditions: Hunting will undergo analysis and will do math with
Lambeau.  Once he is discovered, different people fight to understand
Will Hunting and to pull him in different directions.  For a long
stretch there are just four breeds of scene in this film.  Hunting
carouses and drinks with his rough-playing blue-collar buddies; Hunting
does math with Lambeau, proving himself a far better mathematician than
anybody on the MIT faculty; Hunting has a relationship with Skylar
(Minnie Driver), an English Chemistry student; Hunting has mutually
parasitic mind game sessions with his analyst (Robin Williams).  The
film just goes back and forth among these scenes until Hunting decides
how to handle his life.
     Hunting's ability to turn psychiatrists into raving animals in
minutes seems more modeled on Hannibal Lector than on anything human.
It takes many sessions with his analyst before they can talk in
anything but sarcastic jabs.  The film does a decent job of showing the
relationship between Hunting and his lifelong friend Chuckie (Ben
Affleck) who really care for each other.  The relationship with his
girlfriend was OK, but covers well-trodden territory.  But Hunting's
mind seems really clear only when he is doing mathematics.  It is never
clear what exactly is going on in Hunting's mind or why he changes in
just the ways he does, sometimes playing games and others following the
simplest of advice.  This is a film with a serious credibility problem
and one which stagnates in the middle act.  I would give it a 5 on the
0 to 10 and a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Side comment: It is difficult to present someone superbly
brilliant in a film without having someone being superbly brilliant to
write the script.  Damon does a reasonable job playing the troubled
super-luminary who has buried himself in a lower-class lifestyle, if
any such person has ever existed.  The film draws false parallels to
Ramanujan and Einstein, neither of whom had Will Hunting's broadband
versatility.  For what it is worth, this is one of the few film that
did a reasonable job of representing higher mathematics. Certainly the
they got the facts on the Fields Medal (though they omitted to mention
that you have to be young to win the Fields).  Ramanujan did not
actually work for "many years" with Hardy as stated.  He died quite
young, probably in large part because of his transplanting from his
native climate to England. It was a tremendous loss.
     I would have assumed that answers to really difficult problems in
combinatorics might involve complex counting arguments and would not
fit on a single blackboard, but it is possible.  It filmed nicely, but
it is unlikely a mathematician would do math with a marking pen on a
mirror.  It is too easy to accidentally rub off, it does not give
enough writing space, and the results are not easily portable or
savable.  He may have done some scratch-work there, but even that seems
unlikely.
     It is hard to believe an American mathematician would not know who
Ted Kaczynski is.

Author
Steve Kong
We've all heard of this story line before: Boy-wonder-genius is discovered,
his know how is put to use by some scientist, when the government finds out
about his talent they put the boy-wonder to work for the government. As the
boy works for the government he discovers something completely outrageous
and some bad guys come hunting for the boy, trying to ax him. All I have to
say is: Thank goodness writers/actors Matt Damon and Ben Affleck took a
different approach.
The title of this film has many connotations including holding the name of
the main character, Will Hunting (Matt Damon). Will is a young man who has
a special gift, mathematics (and most other college level stuff).
Everything is as easy to him as tying our shoelaces is to us. He can read
at impressive speeds and just know the material after reading it. By no
means is Will the type of guy like Dustin Hoffman's Rain Man. Will is a
normal guy with an abnormal talent. Will spends his time as a janitor at
MIT and while cleaning the floors one night, Will solves a proof on a
chalkboard which catches the attention of a hardworking professor, Lambeua
(Stellan Skarsgĺrd). After a scuffle with some punks Will is thrown in
jail. Lambeaua offers to help Will out. Under the agreement that Will study
math with Lambeaua and that Will get some therapy.
After a few therapists, Will meets a therapist that has a drive to help
Will out. Sean McGuire (Robin Williams) is from the same part of town as
Will and is never turned away by Will's horrible behavior. The problem with
Will is that he has a lot of talent but he is squandering it away by being
a punk and turning down "real world" ideas. Both Lambeua and McGuire see
this and both want to help him out.
Along the way we get to see a relationship develop between Will and Skylar
(Minnie Driver). This relationship has meaning within the movie, but it
seems somewhat shallow, I would have liked to seen more of the relationship
develop during the film. We also get to meet Will's friends, including his
best friend, Chuckie (Ben Affleck). Again, like the relationship, the
friends in the film seem somewhat underdeveloped and shallow.
Those are small things though because the script works well in tugging and
pulling at our emotions. The biggest relationship developed is the one
between Will and Sean. And it is in this relationship that we find out how
Will became the way that he is. We also see how while Sean is helping Will,
Will is helping Sean.
All performances in Good Will Hunting are top-notch. Matt Damon is on a
roll, first with his big starring role in Francis Ford Coppola's The
Rainmaker, and now with his lead role in Good Will Hunting. I can't wait to
see what he's going to do next. Robin Williams also gives a wonderful
performance. His Professor McGuire is a man with a hard past and Williams
is able to get that across on screen. (I'm also glad to see Williams in a
good movie instead of movies like Flubber and Father's Day.)
The script by Damon and Affleck tries to milk each and every scene for
emotion, whether it is for a laugh or for a tear. And to that extent the
script works very well. Sometimes there is a corny feel to the script, but
that never gets bad enough to ruin the film. The direction by Gus Van Sant
Jr. does a wonderful job keeping the movie moving.
Worth mentioning is the score by Danny Elfman. The score is surprisingly
different from his other works. Elfman's score for Good Will Hunting is
very acoustic and intimate. But, like all his other scores, Elfman is able
to make it so that the score never overshadows what is happening on screen.
Good Will Hunting is a great film. The basis for the film is; if you have
talent don't waste it away. The film comes very close to being inspiring
and the film definitely is a tear-jerker. Don't Miss Good Will Hunting on
the big screen. After seeing the film, let me know what the title means to you.

Author
Alex Fung
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   I think there's one thing that its many enthusiasts and handful of
   detractors can safely agree on: there isn't anything remotely
   innovative about Gus Van Sant's latest film, GOOD WILL HUNTING,
   co-written by stars Matt Damon and Ben Affleck.  It is what it is --
   a relentlessly feelgood drama following a conventional, utterly
   predictable storyline focused upon a directionless young man with
   talent to burn, and the attempts of those around him to help him find
   the right path.  The film's about as unsubtle as a brick through your
   front window, but damned if it isn't effective.
   20-year old Will Hunting (Matt Damon) is a once-in-a-generation-type
   genius who can instantly recall obscure passages from texts and has
   the inherent raw ability to casually solve mathematical problems
   which are considered year-long endeavours by some of the world's
   greatest minds.  However, Will's decidedly working-class, and
   cheerfully so; the film presents the irony of a high school dropout
   toiling as a janitor at the prestigious MIT who's more brilliant than
   any of the university's students *or* teachers.  He's also a bit of a
   handful; orphaned and in and out of foster homes during his
   childhood, Will's had several run-ins with the law.  When
   award-winning professor Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgard of BREAKING THE
   WAVES and INSOMNIA, in another fine performance) presents his class
   with a thorny mathematical challenge, he's taken aback when the
   correct solution appears on the blackboard outside the lecture hall
   the very next day.  None of the students take credit for the
   anonymous answer (they must be pretty honourable over at MIT; at my
   old school, you'd find no shortage of brownnosers who'd falsely lay
   claim to the honour in a heartbeat), but Lambeau is stunned to find
   that it's Will who's the resident genius when he catches the janitor
   scrawling the solutions to a second challenge on the blackboard.
   Before Lambeau can take the prodigy under his wing, Will finds
   himself under arrest after zealously striking a police officer
   intervening in a neighbourhood altercation involving him and his
   buddies Chuckie (Ben Affleck), Morgan (Casey Affleck), and Billy
   (Cole Hauser).  Lambeau convinces the authorities to give Will
   parole, hinging on a weekly math session and the promise of
   counseling.
   It's at this point where the film shifts its focus to where its
   interest lies: the relationship that develops between Will and
   similarly-wounded therapist Sean McGuire (Robin Williams), and how
   after initial dislike and mistrust, they slowly bond and eventually
   help each other overcome past traumas.  Cue the maudlin music.
   The film's hokey and sentimentalist, but it works, successfully
   remaining uplifting and heartwarming despite its obvious generic
   formulism.  To a good extent, the film's ability to overcome problems
   associated with predictability can be credited to the solid
   performances turned in from its impressive cast.  Mr. Williams is
   fine in his quiet, self-contained role, never lapsing into his
   typical zany persona; he carries himself with demeanour of a man
   whose silent sadness weighs upon him like an anchor.  Meanwhile, Mr.
   Damon impresses as the title character, effortlessly alternating
   through Will's many faces -- street tough, brilliant genius, charming
   suitor, exasperating smart-ass, fragile soul -- he's convincingly
   persuasive in all of them.
   Credit has to be allocated to helmer Gus Van Sant as well, who
   fortunately refrains from beating the audience over the head during
   the film's frequent emotionally poignant moments.  His helming is
   thoroughly competent workmanship, with one scene standing out as
   particularly visually striking: a sequence with Will and new love
   Skylar (Minnie Driver) contentedly chatting in bed, which is
   wonderfully lit and shot in close-up by cinematographer Jean Yves
   Escoffier as a great tapestry of flesh and shadows filling the frame,
   gently shifting and rolling like a series of wakes on the sea.
   The GOOD WILL HUNTING screenplay is exceedingly neat and tidy,
   ensuring that everything is brought full circle, and that every major
   event in the film meticulously ties into a prior anecdote.  This may
   or may not be a good thing -- it's certainly tidy screenwriting, but
   it comes across as overly calculated, and plays out onscreen with a
   noticeable loss of spontaneity, particularly in the film's coda where
   key lines are dropped like dominos.
   I admired that the film's screenplay had the temerity to make its
   protagonist not only impertinent and belligerent (albeit, naturally,
   in a loveable, audience-winning sort of way), but even occasionally
   downright cruel to those around him, goading other sympathetic
   characters and zeroing in on their soft spots.  However, the change
   in the Lambeau character as the film progressed seemed particularly
   arbitrary, an artificial means with which to bring the plot to a
   head.
   The themes and storyline of GOOD WILL HUNTING are hardly fresh; they
   are, however, executed effectively.  There's a great deal of
   crowdpleasing material in the film -- one-upmanship of hissable
   characters, warm fuzzy emotional epiphanies, cute snappy one-liners
   -- and if one can ignore the sheer predictability of the story and
   overlook the shameless tugging on the heartstrings, there's much to
   enjoy.
   If anything, the genesis of the GOOD WILL HUNTING project is more
   interesting than the film itself.  Penned by childhood buddies Matt
   Damon and Ben Affleck while they were struggling actors, their
   screenplay generated a bidding war among the studios which quickly
   elevated to a figure of an even million dollars -- if the actors
   would detach themselves from the project.  Resolved to stay on as
   actors on their project, the duo stuck to their guns and eventually
   sold the screenplay (with themselves attached as stars) to Castle
   Rock Entertainment for a lesser fee of $500 000.  The project
   eventually made its way over to Miramax, who have to be delighted
   with the way things have worked out; during the interim, these two
   then-unknowns have blossomed into the hottest young actors working
   today -- Mr. Affleck, fresh from the critically-acclaimed Kevin Smith
   film CHASING AMY, will appear in the upcoming summer Bruce Willis
   vehicle ARMAGEDDON, as well as Dimension's sci-fi thriller PHANTOMS
   and New Line's comedy BALLING THE JACK.  Meanwhile, Mr. Damon seems
   to have been anointed as Hollywood's new It guy (taking over from pal
   Matthew McConaughey), scoring coveted roles with directors as
   esteemed as Francis Ford Coppola (JOHN GRISHAM'S THE RAINMAKER) and
   Steven Spielberg (the upcoming SAVING PRIVATE RYAN).  Well done,
   gents -- but as for GOOD WILL HUNTING: cripes, what's with the
   ridiculous title?
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"There was a six-year-old girl sitting near me, and she piped up 'That's
 Harvey Keitel' within seconds of the film's start.  I want to know what
 that kid's been seeing." - Charles Odell

Author
Homer Yen
Roughneck, janitor, parolee, genius.  These words sum up the essence
of Will Hunting (Matt Damon), a blue-collar boy who lives in the tough
neighborhoods of South Boston.  He likes to invite confrontation,
hangs out with a group of rough-and-tumble guys, and has a police
record a mile long.  In the day, he works at a construction worksite,
but at night, moonlights as a custodian at the Massachusetts Institute
of Technology.  
Within the building where he cleans, there is also an advanced
mathematics class being taught be the illustrious Professor Lambeau
(Stellan Sakrsgard).  As a distinguished faculty member and a Fields
Medal award-winner, he tickles the minds of his students by
challenging them to solve a complex math proof, which he writes on a
blackboard just outside the classroom door.  So difficult is this
challenge, that he expects no one to solve it until the end of the
semester.  Amazingly, someone solves it overnight.
While it's a huge surprise to the Professor who the brilliant mind is,
it is no surprise to the audience if you've seen any of the trailers
or commercials for this film.  Indeed, we learn that it is Will who
has an IQ of Einstein, a photographic memory, and an uncanny capacity
to see through the complexities of any equation.  But despite his
unparalleled talents, Will is suffering on the inside - a victim of
chronic abuse and loneliness from his days as a child, and, sadly,
would rather lay brick, hang out and drink beer rather than use his
gift for the betterment of others and himself.  
Four people try to rescue him from his path of self-destruction,
although their reasons are very different and sometimes selfish.
Professor Lambeau sees this as an opportunity to train a prodigy and
to take the field of math to new and exciting levels.  However, Will
is unruly and undisciplined.  Lambeau seeks a therapist on Will's
behalf and eventually asks his ex-college roommate, Sean McGuire
(Robin Williams), who agrees to help him.  Sean tries to bond with
Will, trying to learn what makes him tick, why he is repressed, and to
find a way for his happiness to emerge from his soul.  Will's world is
also affected by his best friend, Chuckie (Ben Affleck), who wants
Will to realize his gift and to take the initiative to do something
better.  Skylar (Minnie Driver), is Will's love interest who wants to
reach him, but is constantly held at bay by his defensive mechanisms.
This film is a straightforward drama that boasts some nice all-around
performances.  Williams is appealing as the therapist, using witty
banter and some unconventional tactics to break through to Will's
heart.  His role is a refreshing change that harks back to his
earnestness in Dead Poet's Society.   Damon remains focused as a
lonely and insecure soul hiding behind a facade of toughness.  The
storytelling is sound, and the story moves along at a good clip.
>From the beginning, we know that the entire story right up to the
ending will be somewhat predictable.  There are no real surprises
here, and that's ok.  There are precious moments to savor.  For
example, there is a great 'pick-up' scene in a bar as Will and a
Harvard student try to prove their smarts.  I especially liked the
Cro-Magnon-like Chuckie who confesses that his favorite moment in the
day is when he walks up to his house to pick him up to go to work.  "I
keep hoping that one day I'll walk up, and you won't be there," he
says tenderly. And, there are several touching moments between Will
and Sean as their bond grows closer.  At one point during a session by
a pond, Will quips, "is this a Taster's Choice moment?"  Indeed, there
are many such fine individual moments that makes Good Will Hunting a
nice catch.

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
STARRING:   Matt Damon, Robin Williams, Ben Affleck, Minnie Driver,
               Stellan Skasgard
DIRECTOR:   Gus Van Sant
WRITERS:    Matt Damon and Ben Affleck
RATED:      R (for adult language, violence, and sexual situations)
YEAR:       1997
SEEN AT:    Park Place 16, Morrisville NC
        True genius must be a hard thing to live with.  "Good Will
Hunting," the latest film from director Gus Van Sant (Drugstore
Cowboy), explores this concept through the eyes of a twenty year-old
who happens to be a mental giant, and is filled with self-loathing
because of it.
        Matt Damon is Will Hunting, a brilliant young man with
absolutely no ambition whatsoever.  He surrounds himself with losers,
a grungy ratpack which includes his best friend Chuckie (an engaging
Ben Affleck).  Most of the group's evenings are spent getting drunk
and/or looking for fights, two activities they never seem to grow
tired of.
        But there's more to Will than initially meets the eye.  Able
to flip through books at the rate of a page per second yet still
retain everything he reads, Will possesses the intellectual
equivalent of several college degrees, despite being a high-school
dropout.  His quick mind deconstructs even the most complex
mathematics into laughably simply equations, making him the envy of
every scholar he meets.
        This includes Gerald Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgard), an M.I.T.
professor who is the first to recognize Will's extraordinary
potential.  After Will easily solves an equation that has baffled
even Lambeau's most brilliant students, the professor comes to a
staggering conclusion: M.I.T. harbors one of the sharpest
mathematical minds the world has ever known... as its janitor.
        Yes, a janitor, for that is the extent of Will's ambition.
He walks around campus, emptying trashcans, mopping floors... and
solving the math problems Lambeau leaves lying around, simply because
he can.  By the time Lambeau realises what's going on, Will is in
jail, arrested once again for fighting.  The judge, who knows Will's
troubled past, does not wish to send him back to the streets, but
Lambeau intercedes.  If the judge is willing to release Will into
his custody, Lambeau promises he will find counseling for the boy,
plus keep him occupied with math-related work, which will hopefully
keep him too busy to get into more trouble.
        The math part is easy.  Finding a counselor willing to spend
more than ten minutes in the same room with Will, however, proves to
be a major challenge.  So clever is Will that he sees through every
psychiatric trick anyone tries to pull on him.  Desperate, Lambeau
calls in his old college roomate and arch-rival, Sean McGuire (Robin
Williams).  From this point on, the story focuses on the complex
relationship which develops between Sean and Will, with each man
determined to wear the other down, and neither willing to give up on
this goal.
        Robin Williams has never been better.  His performance as
Sean is so intense that the word "brilliant" simply doesn't do it
justice.  Of particular note is the tear-jerking monologue (performed
in a single unbroken take) that Sean recites to Will while the two
are sitting in a local park, experiencing what Will calls "a Taster's
Choice moment for guys."  This speech ranks right up there with
cinema's very finest.  Mr. Williams deservedly brought home the 1997
Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor for his work here; even if
the rest of the film had been horrible, this scene alone is powerful
enough to justify his nomination.
        Matt Damon is also very good.  He plays Will as an insecure
young man frightened by his potential; while not really malicious,
Will is slow to trust others, and automatically pushes people away
when they begin to get too close to him.  We see this in his
relationship with Skylar (Minnie Driver), a British student who falls
in love with him.  Their tumultuous romance forms one of the film's
emotional cornerstones, as well as providing the setup for the
story's bittersweet yet satisfying conclusion.
        "Good Will Hunting" is an emotional tour de force, running
the gauntlet from hilarity ("Do you like apples?") to heartache.
The script, written by stars Damon and Affleck, is smart and rich,
as are all the performances.  Never boring or uninvolving, the film
brings us deep into the world of a largely unsympathetic character
and makes him a "real" person.  Even as we recoil in horror at the
way Will treats Skylar, we understand *why* he acts the way he does.
His pain runs very deep; while that does not neccessarily excuse
his behavior, it does explain it.
        I read somewhere that Damon and Affleck's original idea for
the script was closer to James Bond: they wanted to write an
espionage/action film, with Will using his mental abilities to solve
a mystery while "bad guys" try to kill him.  Fortunately for us,
screenplays have a way of evolving into their own thing.  "Good Will
Hunting" is sweet, funny, touching, memorable, and the furthest
thing in the world from a ho-hum action movie.  It was one of my
favorite films of 1997.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.

Author
Seth Bookey
Seen on 7 December 1997 for $0 at the Loews New York Twin. 
*Good Will Hunting* is a situation drama about a supergenius who cleans
the floors at MIT instead of pacing them as a student.
That's the situation, the high-concept, if you will. Mathematics professor
Lambeau (Stellan Skargard) leaves an "impossible" problem on the bulletin
board, and Will Hunting solves it. Lambeau tracks him down and wants to
take credit for discovering him. But, for all his cerebral cortex action,
Will is a diamond in the rough, and needs polishing if he's going to
become part of the Establishment. 
Will's life is rooted in South Boston, an orphan shuttled around foster
homes who now lives in a dump, works in construction, and gets into
trouble with his ne'er-do-well friends, who clearly have no use or respect
for the college kids that abound in Boston. 
To get him under control, Lambeau takes Will to prominent psychiatrists,
all of whom Will either infuriates or outwits, until he reaches Sean
McGuire (Robin Williams), who is an old friend of Lambeau's who is also
from South Boston, and teaches at a Bunker Hill Community College. 
What follows is a fairly predictable and average "he's met his match and
they have more in common and they learn a lot from each other story."
McGuire's background: he lost his beloved wife and is "ironically" in his
own protective shell, "ironically," just like Will. It's a good premise,
but it just wasn't very interesting. Even the double-entendre title (Good
Will Hunting, hunting for good will) seems a bit sophomoric and quite the
cliche. 
Skylar, Will's love interest, played by the personable Minnie Driver,
who--finally--gets to use her (real) British accent. The interaction Will
has with her and with his friend Chuckie (Ben Affleck) is the most
believable. The epiphanies Will reaches with them seem much less hackneyed
than the ones he reaches with McGuire. In fact, it is Affleck's speech to
Will that really seems to cut through Will's defenses more than anything
else. Robin Williams' performance is a bit too earnest and forced.
Perhaps it's my own bourgeois background, but it was difficult for me to
understand the reverse snobbery shown in *Good Will Hunting* that keeps a
supergenius stuck in a clapboard shack with a screen door that is barely
on its hinges. Apparently, it was h ard for Chuckie to understand either,
and he's from the same background. 
The performances are what stand out in this movie. Damon is charming and
funny, as is Driver. Affleck's big scene gives Chuckie some actual depth
the rest of the characters are lacking. But, it's enjoyable nonetheless;
I've seen a lot worse. 
Directed by Gus Van Sant, this must be his blandest offering yet, when you
consider his credits include the offbeat *Drugstore Cowboy*, *My Own
Private Idaho*, *Even Cowgirls Get the Blues*, and more recently, his
biting, more upscale hit *To Die For*. *Good Will Hunting* is probably
good for his bankroll and his Hollywood credentials, but it is the least
original of his projects. 
Affleck and Damon have been hyped for penning and selling their
screenplay. Why? It's a feel-good movie written by two men already firmly
entrenched in the Hollywood establishment. Affleck was in Chasing Amy last
year, and Damon has had three big movies this year and the cover of
Vanity Fair. It doesn't seem that David-and-Goliath to me. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Author
Ben Hoffman
Matt Damon and Ben Affleck wrote the wonderfully mature and
perceptive  script while still in college.   That in itself is quite
astonishing; one does not usually find such insight in the young.
In addition, the dialog was excellent; funny when that was its
intent, on target when a point was to be made.  All of which
contributed to a most captivating film.
Will Hunting (Matt Damon) is a genius, not only in math but in just
about any other field.    With a photographic mind, he has total
recall.  He is not a "mixer," having but a few close friends,
especially Chucky (Ben Affleck).  Fame and fortune are not his bag
so that when his professor, the brilliant mathemetician Lambeau,
(Stellan Skarsgard) poses a difficult problem on the blackboard,
Will solves it quickly but leaves no name as to who had worked out
the problem.
Will, an orphan with a step-father who abused him,  does not take
guff from anyone so it is not surprising that he gets in trouble
beating up a policeman.  One scene shows this genius mopping the
floors of his school, MIT.    Eventually, Lambeau realizes it is
Will who solved the math problem even he was unable to do.   He then
makes it his mission to bring Will out of his mode of living and of
his behavior and send him to several psychiatrists, none of whom are
able to handle this genius.   Finally, Will is asked to see
Lambeau's  old school-friend, psychology professor Sean McGuire
(Robin Williams).
The whole portion of the film devoted to McGuire is beautifully
rendered with many subplots about Sean teaching at a lowly community
college whereas Lambeau has it made at MIT.  Some very  pithy remarks
and exchanges take place between the genius and the professor.  When
Will tells Sean that he has a girlfriend (Minnie Driver) whom he
loves; that both she and he are perfect, Sean replies "Neither you
nor your girlfriend are perfect but what matters most is, are you
perfect for each other?"     When Lambeau tells McGuire that Will
has the potential to be world-famous, Robins asks, is that what you
want for him or is that what Will wants?
All in all, a most involving film with Robin Williams again giving
his usual very fine performance and Matt Damon fulfilling his role
admirably.   Not to be missed.

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Gus Van Sant
Writers: Ben Affleck and Matt Damon
Starring: Matt Damon, Robin Williams, Minnie Driver, Stellan Skarsgĺrd,
Ben Affleck, Cole Hauser, Casy Affleck, George Plimpton
There are certain people in the world who have some talent that very few
people have, but they chose not to take advantage of this for some
personal reason.  "Good Will Hunting" is about one of those people.
The Will Hunting of the (horrible) title (let's face it, this film would
be a bitch to title), played by co-writer Matt Damon, is a mathematical
genius.  He can do almost any mathematical connundrum in about the time
it takes to brew a cup of Irish Cream Cappuccino.  And he works at
MIT...as the janitor.
One day, the professor of one of the most challenging courses,
Proffessor Lambeau ("Breaking the Waves"'s Stellan Skarsgĺrd), puts a
big problem on the board for his students to attempt to complete.  The
next day, it's already done on the board, but no one in his class claims
to have done it.  So Lambeau puts another problem on the board, this
time one that took he and his colleagues over two years to prove.  And,
duh, it's done again.  Of course, they catch the guy who did it red
handed - Will.
Before Lambeau can find Will again (he ran away when he caught him),
Will has gotten into a fight with a bunch of punks on a basketball
court, and struck a police officer, so Lambeau gets him out on probation
with two agreements: a) he work with him on math, and b) he get some
therapy.  After going through some therapists whom he psyches out in one
way or another (for a hypnotist, he fakes being under his spell, then
launches into an impromptu performance of the 70s classic, "Afternoon
Delight").
Finally, Lambeau's old college roomate, Sean McGuire (Robin Williams), a
psych professor, agrees to treat him, and the two begin a rocky
relationship, as Sean tries to get Will to open up.  Turns out Will had
a rough childhood, being abandoned, and placed in foster homes and what
not.  It also turns out that Will does not want to do simple mathematics
all his life; he wants a challenge.  And that is to hang out with his
buds (including the other co-writer, Ben Affleck), and do honorable
jobs, like construction.
Is it right to make this genius follow in the footsteps of Einstein and
Kasinsky?  Should this guy be forced to do something he doesn't want to
do?  This appears to be one of the million questions in this film, which
is jam-packed with greatness, but does not have the totally brilliant
whole it should.
I'm not saying "Good Will Hunting" is a bad film at all.  It's a very
enjoyable film with tons of great moments, and lots of great things
about it.  The acting is amazing, with two Oscar-nomination-worthy
performances from Damon and Williams, who have amazing chemistry
together.  We also get some great support from Stellan Skarsgĺrd (great
name), Ben Affleck, and from Minnie Driver, who plays Will's love
interest, Skylar.
There are tons of individual moments that I adored.  I loved all the
comedy in the film, especially a scene where Damon proves a schmuck out
of a college student who is quoting a historian to impress some chicks,
his various attempts at therapy, and of course, my favorite scene in the
entire film, the one where he delivers a long, exstensive rant to some
NSA agents about the downside of working for them.
I liked the relationship between some of the people, like Will and
Skylar, Will and Sean, Sean and Lambeau, and Will and his friends. 
There are scenes between them which are just amazing to watch.  And
there are even moments in the film which are so honest in their
portrayal, that I felt rightfully uncomfortable.  Like the break-up
scene between Will and Skylar, Will and Sean's first meeting, a bar
scene between Sean and Lambeau, and a scene where Sean tells in detail
how he doesn't regret meeting his first wife, who would later suffer a
slow, painful death, and leave him lonely and slightly bitter.
However, the main flaw of the film is there's too much of everything,
and not enough of it either.  The film tries for deeper relations
between the characters, but they're sometimes either overwritten or
underwritten.  Take for example the relationship between Sean and Will:
the film gets an interesting father/son as well as doctor/patient
relationship going with out any problems, but when it tries to show them
as equals, it falls on its face.  We hear how they went to the same
town, and there are even scenes where the film shows how hypocritical
both of them are at times.  But this never takes off like the other
parts of their relationship do.
Also, Will's relationship with his best friend, Chuckie (Affleck), has a
nice climax, but not enough rising action.  We see them joking around,
but when Chuckie arrives at a decision between the two of them, it seems
more like a superficial reasoning than a more selected one.  Their
relationship never goes beyond "just best friends," and his decision
just seems to be a generalization of any two best friends instead of
something more...human.  Maybe it was just me.  And it also goes for a
parallelism with the relationship between Sean and Lambeau, but that,
again, is underwritten.
And, of course, as in most films like this, the girl/boy relationship is
pretty underwritten.  We never understand what they see in each other,
so when Skylar confesses that she loves him, it seems more like it's
there for plot details that anything else.  Minnie Driver is
interesting, though, and breathes life into her character.
The writing is a bit at fault here, but what makes all this worthwhile
is the little moments in the film where it acheives true awesomeness. 
Sure, it feels overstuffed, but it's extremely enjoyable.  The dialogue
that Affleck and Damon have written is amazingly fresh, and seems
extremely human.  I think that they should get a nomination for their
script chiefly because of the dialogue, which is amazing.
While this is probably director Gus Van Sant's most conservative film
(you'd hardly know it's the same director of "To Die For," the only Van
Sant film I've seen, really), it's still a pretty remarkable film,
albeit a tad overrated (what's this "best picture" deal?).  And if a
film puts a smile on my face despite posessing a lot of flaws, I have no
problem with reccomending it to anyone.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Paul K. Bisson
By Paul K. Bisson (THE 'BISSON'S ON' WEB PAGE)
Perhaps it's a metaphor for life. Or, more to the point, perhaps its a
metaphor for what we're all supposed to do with our lives. I'd like to
believe that. Because "Good Will Hunting" is not a new film in every
aspect--in fact, its plot and theme have been given to us many times
at the movies. And we know, almost at least, how it will end--so there
had better be something new and engaging to watch this time 'round.
Matt Damon and Ben Affleck star as two "star-crossed lovers" who set
sail aboard.....Oops! Wrong flick. 
Matt Damon stars as the guy we all know. Maybe its a brother or
perhaps its a best friend--or maybe its even us. Its the guy that is
so certain of his particular talents and potential and so aware of the
fact that he can change the course of his life--if he just chose to do
it--that it scares him.
What also scares him is the fact that he's got it good right now.
Maybe he doesn't have the best job, or the best pay, or the best
recognition, or the best home--but his life is a safe one, a secure
one. And isn't that what makes us so afraid of change? The fear of
losing what security we have now--no matter how much of a dump we know
it to be?
Will Hunting (Damon) is a tough, streetwise 20 year old from South
Boston, Ma, who spent most of his life being shuffled from one abusive
foster home to the next, slowly being stripped of any self-worth or
security of "family." Finally ending up in tiny shack of an apartment
all his own, he created his own world of security--he's got his best
friend, Chuckie (Ben Affleck), a ratpack of trusted, loyal friends and
a pretty good job working at MIT--as a janitor. Not much, but its his
and he's satisfied. Well almost.
See, he's a genius, too. A mathematical wizard, able to dissect the
problems most seasoned math professionals can't. It comes natural to
him, so he is easily ignorant of the possibilities such talent can
create. But its not so easy for MIT professor, Lambeau (Stellan
Skarsgĺrd) to ignore, once he discovers that Hunting has this
ability--and is wasting it.
The professor sees the amazing contradiction in Hunting. He's a wild,
rebellious kid with a chip on his shoulder who just happens to possess
the mind of an Einstein. The professor understands that the only way
for Hunting to excel, is to rid him of that chip. And when Lambeau
tries to coerce the kid into getting therapy, it backfires--as every
psychologist discovers that they can't stand to be in the same room
with him--much less help him.
That's when Lambeau seeks the aid of a long time friend and rival,
Sean McGuire (Robbin Williams in, perhaps, his most dramatic &
powerful role yet). McGuire, a widower and ex-therapist turned college
teacher, grew up in much the same environment as Hunting...and he may
have the key to unlock the kid's emotional doors.
>From here, we are taken on a journey of discovery. Learning about both
McGuire and Hunting, realizing that they may, in fact, be the same
person inside. During their many battles and sparrings of the mind, we
also learn that the kid may be just what McGuire needs to release his
own demons.
As I said, the plot isn't very original. But the performers give us
such riveting and believable characters, that we don't really care.
And the truth about these characters is undeniable. Its easy to see a
bit of ourselves or someone we know in all of them. From Hunting's
best friend, Chuckie, who knows that his life is already written and
who will most likely live and die in the same town, to Hunting's
lover, Skylar (Minnie Driver), a young, vibrant medical student that
finds in Hunting the one thing missing from her seemingly perfect
life, to the professor Lambeau himself, always reaching--never
attaining; "Sometimes I wish I had never met you. Because then I could
go to sleep at night not knowing there was someone like you out
there."
But this is a story about choices. To be satisfied with what we've got
now because its secure and safe or to believe in ourselves and take a
chance on the unknown. And it's also about redemption. Learning to
forgive others, including ourselves, letting go of our shields and
letting people into our hearts--no matter what they might find.
Learning to trust.
For me, it was easy to identify with Hunting. Our lives contain much
the same elements; spending the early parts of my youth in one abusive
foster home after another, then fending off the mean streets of South
Boston, Dorchester and Roxbury in my early teens--to discovering my
talents in the arts and learning to put all my energies toward them.
My life now is the result of change. I'd either be dead or in prison
had it gone any other way.
And there in lies the success of "Good Will Hunting." What it says to
people like me and you about our talents and potential. What it says
about opening up and allowing ourselves to trust someone, letting them
in. What it says about how doing these things may change our
perspective on who we really are and what life is all about, thus, not
denying ourselves of what might be... 
REVIEW COPYRIGHT 1998 PAUL K. BISSON
Taken from the "BISSON'S ON" Web Page at
http://www.harbor.cove.com/~bisson/HuntingReview.htm

Author
Andrew Hicks
        At the time of the 1998 Oscars, I had seen four out of five 
Best Picture nominees. The only one I hadn't seen was GOOD WILL 
HUNTING, and it took another three months to remedy that. I don't know 
why I had the motivation to go see theatrical movies like WILD THINGS 
and GODZILLA while neglecting this movie, but now that I finally have 
seen GOOD WILL HUNTING, my question is, why all the hoopla? It's a 
good movie, yeah, but not really Oscar quality.
        My personal theory is that the Hollywood community didn't 
expect much out of a movie written by pretty-boy actors like Matt 
Damon and Ben Affleck, and the fact that GOOD WILL HUNTING actually 
was good bowled the Oscar folks over. Otherwise, it's a routine 
Prodigy Rebel Who Doesn't Want To Get Close To Anyone Or Do 
Much With His Life drama that comes complete with a cross-tracks, 
cross-continental romance that begins, ends and resumes on schedule 
and an eccentric father-figure who is the only person who can break 
through to the Prodigy Rebel.
        Damon is the genius in question, a 20-year-old janitor at the 
Massachusetts Institute of Technology. That must be impressive when 
he comes across someone who mops floors at a state university. ("Oh 
yeah? I'm an Ivy League janitor!") Even more impressive is the fact 
that he solves a medal-winning professor's proof that is posted in a 
hallway. He's a very smart boy, you see, but he hangs out with slackers 
like Affleck who spend most of their time drinking and getting into 
fights.
        It's after one such fight that Damon heads off to prison, where 
they love guys with butts as nice as his. The judge is unimpressed with 
his citing of legal precedents from the 1700s and only releases him 
when the MIT professor intercedes. In addition to helping him with 
difficult mathematical formulas, Damon has to see a therapist every 
week. A few amusing scenes ensue as Damon manages to drive away a 
series of therapists.
        We know from seeing Oscar-boy Robin Williams' name in the 
credits that he's going to be the one that ends up helping the kid Love 
Life. The Williams character is dangerously close to the DEAD POETS 
SOCIETY mold but is a complicated and well-written one. If there's any 
one good thing about GOOD WILL HUNTING, it's that all the characters 
know what each other's problems are and can have the kind of 
articulated arguments that only come across in movies.
        Still, it's a copout that the only thing holding Damon's 
character back is that he was beaten as a child. His diatribe about 
having cigarettes put out on his body made me wonder just how many 
movie characters have been used as ashtrays. It's a pretty convenient 
dramatic device that dates back, at least, to John Hughes and THE 
BREAKFAST CLUB. And even more of a copout that all it takes to solve 
Damon's problems is for Williams to keep saying, "It's not your fault" 
over and over again.
        I can complain all I want but the truth is Damon and 
Williams both did terrific work in this movie. Affleck, on the other 
hand, isn't around much and, when he is, he more or less plays the 
same addled but charming character he always has. You know, the 
kind that inevitably says, "I ain't the smartest guy on the block, but I 
do know this..." And Minnie Driver, she's charming, but why the hell 
was she nominated for this movie? As the Harvard pre-law love 
interest, her British ass is around for maybe 20 minutes total. I think 
she did better in GROSSE POINT BLANK.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Author
Jason Overbeck
My mind is constantly at work in all the movies I see.  My brain races to
find the ending of a film even before its plot has been fully revealed.  I
didn't let my mind race in Good Will Hunting, because I was too caught up
in the dialogue and characterizations.  I couldn't ruin the experience of
the film but trying to out-think it. 
This is a wonderful film that reminded me of CHASING AMY, another of the
years best films.  The writing is very funny and fresh, with some of the
best dialogue spoken all year.  I relish in good writing, in a year when we
are enflicted with trash like THE SAINT and DANTES PEAK.  I laughed more in
this film than I did in most comidies like LIAR LIAR and THE FULL MONTY.
Matched with the funny comedy is truely heart wrenching moments that
reminded me of TERMS OF ENDEARMENT, one of the best films in the eighties. 
Damon and Affleck will probable win the best screenplay oscar and deserve
it.  Critics who dismis this film as being overly predictable are not doing
the film justice.  SOme of these are the same guys who over-praised the
film SLING BLADE.

Author
Luke Buckmaster
Theres something a little unsettling about Will Hunting.  Sure  hes a genius
born on the wrong side of the tracks, with the IQ of Einstein and a PHD in being
a smart-ass.  But lets look at the situation seriously: Will is smart enough to
solve an equation that few people in the world are able to, but dumb enough to
continuously punch a guys head in when he can hear the cops a coming.  Not to
mention being caught for theft, fights and other fairly pathetic crimes.  He may
be able to recite word for word a chapter from a book and solve complicated
equations, but he doesnt seem to be quite so smart when it comes to simple
everyday actions and thoughts.  This is why he mucks up a good relationship with
his girlfriend, lands himself in a low paying job and fails to grasp the idea of
loving anybody but himself.
Will (Matt Damon) works as a cleaner at one of Americas prestigious schools.
When he secretly solves a complex maths problem written on a black board, maths
Professor Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgerd) attempts to track down the mystery
intellect.  But when he eventually discover who it is, Will has been arrested
and given a prison sentence.
Lambeau is able to convince the judge to free Will on two terms: that he spends
one day a week meeting with Lambeau and one day a week meeting with a therapist.
After quickly humiliating two shrinks (one in a hilarious afternoon delight
scene), he meets his match when introduced to the wise Sean McGuire (Robin
Williams).  Wills best mate (Ben Affleck) and new girlfriend (Minnie Driver)
also complicate his bewildered life.
The exquisite scenes of tense and ardent drama between Will and Sean are the
core of the film.  The rest of it, however, is a fairly ordinary story simply
told well.
Its been quite some time since Robin Williams has performed in such a mature
and robust way.  Many of his recent films (Flubber, Jumanji, Mrs Doubtfire) have
been laughable in more ways than one.  At last we have something that can stand
up against the microscope and exploit Williams skill; reassuring us that he is
indeed an actor capable to appeal to people above the age of twelve.
Good Will Hunting is fundamentally a fairly ordinary show.  Gus Van Sant (and
the films writers, Damon and Affleck) deserves credit, though, as what we have
here is a solid and clever concoction of socially aware drama.  But what could
have been a physiological battle of emotions gets tangled up with silly little
detours into childish relationships and situations.
Its good  yes, but Good Will Hunting does not match up to the hype which so
wholly surrounded it.   It shouldnt be known as the savoir of teen dramas, the
Oscar winner or the lavish masterpiece that perhaps something like Titanic is.
The thin line between good and great is often crossed in Good Will Huntings
duration  but only to find that it stabs itself in the foot when trying to be a
far too complete film.


Author
George Wilcox
Two up-and-coming actors you probably haven't heard of, Ben Affleck
and Matt Damon, have only recently been featured in their first
leading roles this year, and already they have their pet project
coming our way. Now that's show business.
The rising young stars have created a personal postcard of their
hometown with "Good Will Hunting," the screenwriting debut of the best
friends, high school classmates and current Los Angeles roommates.
The Boston-area natives enlisted the help of New England-educated
director Gus Van Sant to create a rewarding film about a young genius
from blue-collar South Boston, who must deal with the recent discovery
of his mathematic problem-solving powers.
This is clearly a personal triumph for co-writers Affleck ("Chasing
Amy") and Damon ("The Rainmaker"), who return to their Beantown roots,
accents included, and provide snippets from the best of the Hub: the
Charles River, Harvard Square, Charlestown and the T's Red Line.
Damon gets the better role as Will Hunting, a 20-year-old orphan with
photographic memory working as a janitor at M.I.T. The film's title is
an oxymoron, since there is little goodwill with Will. He drinks with
the guys too much, gets into a street fight and punches out a cop. For
kicks, Will likes to prove complicated mathematic equations provided
by M.I.T. professor Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgard, currently of
"Amistad").
Ironically, Affleck hasn't written much of a role for himself as
Chuckie, one of Will's drinking buddies along with Affleck's brother,
Casey, as Morgan. Chuckie has one big scene, but the film is built
entirely around Will.
Affleck and Damon's influences are clearly from New Jersey ndependent
writer-director Kevin Smith, who has been riding a roller coaster with
heralded "Clerks," spiteful "Mallrats" and quirky "Chasing Amy." "Good
Will Hunting" is well written. It is raw, down to earth, lively, and
cynical about life and society. Affleck and Damon aren't afraid of
challenging the establishment, whether it is high-minded academia or
government bureaucracy.
"Good Will Hunting," however, follows similar territory about previous
movies involving discovered genius. More recently, "Little Man Tate"
or even the 1968 Cliff Robertson-Oscar winning film "Charly," also set
in Boston, dealt with how genius is found in the unlikeliest of
people. "In Little Man Tate," it is a small boy. In "Charly," it is a
retarded older man subjected to medical experiments.
Genius is seen as a burden each time, and troubled Will Hunting
doesn't seem any different. He is undecided about a purpose in his
life, undecided about a woman, Skylar (Minnie Driver, Damon's
real-life girlfriend), he has recently met. Undecided about pretty
much everything.
Robin Williams is brought in as a junior college psychology professor,
Sean Maguire,who is enlisted to help Will. The role is similar to
Williams' teacher in "Dead Poets Society," without the
hysterics. Maguire is more wise beyond his years and opens young
Will's eyes to a world he has only memorized in books.
Maguire agrees to see Will at the urging of Lambeau, who took over
temporary custody of the rebellious Will after his legal
problems. Lambeau hopes to tutor Will in advanced mathematics and then
send him off to a think tank.
It's difficult to take your eyes off Damon, who broke through this
year with the lead role in Francis Coppola's film version of another
John Grisham novel. Damon's first major role was as a drugged-out
Persian Gulf war veteran in the underappreciated "Courage Under Fire."
Damon's three main roles already have a few things in common. Damon,
with his wry smile and shaggy brown hair, excels at playing insecure
individuals with a secret, wounded past. He seems sincere and
trustworthy when he is lying, which is why you'll be seeing more of
his name in the near future.
I'm not sure if this is a one-shot deal for the co-writers from
Cambridge, who might appear to be at a crossroads after writing a fine
first script. It could be a Catch-22 for them. Both have refreshing
new faces that should lead to greater acting success, but do they wish
to be considered actors or proven screenwriters? We shall see.

Author
Christopher Null
     Hype?  Sheesh, like no other.  This side of TITANIC, GOOD WILL HUNTING
has enjoyed some of the most baffling, gushing praise of the year.  Does
either film deserve it?  Not really.
     Let's look at the facts: You have Matt Damon as Will Hunting --
apparently the smartest man on the face of the earth who can also kick
anyone's ass over breakfast, and has a history of run-ins with the law.  Oh
no!  Affleck is his down-to-earth best bud.  Driver, the hoity-toity love
interest.  Williams and Skarsgĺrd as Hunting's mentors, the guys that rescue
him from a prison sentence for assaulting a police officer.  And it is made
abundantly clear that the film is also about the class stuggle in Boston.
     Now that I've typed it out, it sounds ridiculous, and the more I think
about it, the more it really *is*.  The plot and theme of GOOD WILL HUNTING
hinge upon the idea that it's tough for the smartest man in the world to make
the move from crumb-bum to respectable member of society.  Why?  Because (a)
"just because he has a gift he doesn't have to use it!" and (b) he had a
troubled childhood.  Well, boo hoo!
     The more I write, the more it sounds like a topic on "Jenny Jones": Boy
Geniuses on the Wrong Side of the Tracks.  Right.  If any believable character
had this guy's abilities, this movie would have been much different... and
probably much shorter, too.
     I realize I'm ranting here, but the pop psychology of HUNTING reaches
such a high level of annoyance so that when Williams tearfully confronts Damon
with the film's signature line of -- I kid you not -- "It's not your fault,"
it just gets silly.  And it lost me.
     The script, written by Damon and Affleck, is otherwise humorous and keeps
you entertained.  Van Sant's direction is inexplicably amateurish and features
some lousy voice dubbing.  Williams is pretty good in his role, and for what
it's worth, so is Damon, even though the character is ludicrous.  All told,
the film has plenty of enjoyable moments, but it's just not the deep
experience the filmmakers want you to believe it is.
     And neither was TITANIC.  That ought to guarantee me plenty of hate mail
for the next few weeks.  Fire away.
Director: Gus Van Sant Jr.
Producer: Lawrence Bender
Writer: Matt Damon, Ben Affleck
Starring: Matt Damon, Robin Williams, Ben Affleck, Minnie Driver, Stellan Skarsgĺrd
http://www.miramax.com:8888/mm_front/owa/mp.entryPoint?action=1&midStr=497
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
David Wilcock
Good Will Hunting, written by friends Matt Damon and Ben Affleck, is
an absolutely stunning debut film.  Damon plays Will Hunting, a
janitor at Harvard who also happens to be a genius. He can solve
problems mathematicians took years to solve in minutes. However,
despite is genius and huge potential, his life is mainly getting into
fights with rival gangs in the area, along with his friend Chuckie
(the superb Affleck) and other friends. One day he is caught by the
police, and sentenced to jail.  However, math's professor Lambeau
(Skarsgard) knows about his potential, and offers to free him if (a)he
goes to math lessons and (b)he has therapy. Damon agrees, his
therapist turns out to be Sean Maguire (a bearded and superb
Williams), and he also falls in love with english student Skylar,
played well by Driver.
Although the story is cliched, with everything being resolved
perfectly at the end (Williams get over the death of his wife, Damon
finally realizes that Driver is his 'soul mate', Affleck is the best
friend with heart) the dialogue, acting and direction is so brilliant,
the film is just really good fun.  Unlike Titanic (1997), which
suffered from a poor script, and underwritten characters, Good Will
Hunting is smart, witty, and has superbly written characters, and
never falls into extreme schmaltz, which inferior movies would
probably do. Damon and Affleck have written a superb script, with all
the characters 'just right.' The gang speak exactly how you would
expect them to speak, because this film is written by teenagers, not
by some 40 year old who are trying to be like kids.  But even Williams
speeches are superbly adult, they don't seem 'childish' at all. So,
having proved themselves as great writers, Damon and Affleck are also
superb actors as well.  Damon is excellent as the wasted genius.  He
can show unhappiness, anger, laughter and sadness with ease, it never
seems fake. Affleck, although with a smaller role, is superb as the
best friend, he really does act like how a 20 year old friend
would. Robin Williams is also fantastic. This is his best dramatic
role to date, far better than his good performances in Dead Poets
Society (1988) and Awakenings (1990) And Skarsgard, is great as the
arrogant math's professor. Driver delivers a great performance,
although her character seems to be the most underwritten. Sadly, she
hardly features in the film, her role could have been a bit more
meatier. None the less, she is still outstanding.
The director, Gus Van Sant (To Die For, 1995) is also very good. He
uses slow motion well, and makes sure the gets the maximum emotion out
of any scene. The audience cries and laughs with the characters on
screen.  He really lets the audience feel with the characters. The
music, by Danny Elfman (Beetlejuice, 1988) is also very good,
highlighting the emotion even more. In fact, everything about this
film is masterful. There is hardly a major flaw in the film
aswell. Even it's length doesn't seem too long.  And although there is
a lot of swearing in the film, it all seems justified, and never out
of place. Good Will Hunting is damn near perfection, and considering
this is a debut script, that is a huge achievement.
Overall, Good Will Hunting deserves to win every OSCAR it has been
nominated for. Far superior to Titanic in terms of script and
characters, it will hopefully beat James Cameron epic. Good Will
Hunting is a film that can be enjoyed by everyone, as it has it fair
share of laughs, sadness, and anger. The film never outstays it's
welcome, it never forces it's message onto the audience, it never toys
with the audiences emotion (e.g. forcing the audience to cry or
laugh.) It will take a very heartless person to not enjoy Good Will
Hunting. Far better than any other 'movie with a message' you'll ever
see, Good Will Hunting comes highly recommended, thanks to superb
acting, writing, directing and even music. Like Boogie Nights (1997),
do not miss out on Good Will Hunting.

Author
Kevin Patterson
I must admit that I was a tad skeptical of "Good Will Hunting", based both on
the previews and the first fifteen minutes of the film, in which the main
character Will Hunting (Matt Damon), an MIT janitor in his early twenties, is
discovered to be an Einstein-level closet genius when he solves two
extraordinarily difficult math problems overnight. The only problem is that
Will is a tough street kid who's had his share of run-ins with the law, and
before long he's being hauled in for assault after a parking lot fight.
Professor Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgard), who had brought up the math problems in
his lectures, tracks him down and strikes a deal with the police: Will is to
be released, provided he works with Lambeau on his math research regularly and
attends therapy sessions. 
This sounds like the formula for mildly charming fluff, but "Good Will
Hunting" rises above its fairly mundane premise to deliver a poignant and
clever drama. A conflict gradually emerges between Lambeau and Will's
therapist Sean McGuire (Robin Williams) - Lambeau wants to get Will to use his
brain, while Sean wants him to listen to his heart, both of which he has been
largely neglecting. Will finds that the former is much easier than the latter,
so much so, in fact, that he gets bored with it and grows increasingly
resistant to Lambeau's attempts to recruit him into the academic lifestyle. He
also has his share of problems with his girlfriend Skylar (Minnie Driver), an
MIT student who is moving to California at the end of the school year and
would like a reluctant Will to come with her. 
What makes "Good Will Hunting" work so well, aside from the strong
performances (especially from Damon and Williams), is the depth of
characterization and the representation of the conflicts in Will's life. The
script's sympathies seem to lie more with Sean McGuire than with Lambeau, but
neither of them is presented as completely right or wrong. Lambeau, while he
may seem a little cold at times, is still written well enough that we like him
as a character even when we're not sure if we like what he has to say. And
Sean, for all his warm-heartedness, has, as Lambeau and later Will point out,
not lived up to his full intellectual potential either; the therapy sessions
turn out to be just as revelatory for Sean as they do for Will. 
Will's reaction to this situation, and the way in which he slowly becomes more
receptive to Skylar and to Sean, is presented in a believable fashion and in a
way that forces the audience to consider all the characters' opinions, rather
than setting up an obvious "right" and "wrong" side and beating them over the
head with it. For a film with such an extraordinary character, "Good Will
Hunting" presents itself as remarkably ordinary; it achieves the difficult
task of making the next Albert Einstein into an Everyman, a character to whom
the audience can easily relate and who must make choices similar to those that
almost everyone faces at one time or another. This film gives us real drama
when it so easily could have given us merely melodrama, by having the
government kidnap Will to use him in covert spy missions or introducing some
other equally far-fetched situation. 
"Good Will Hunting" also has its share of fun humor, such as when Will, in an
early therapy session, pretends to be hypnotized and smoothly parodies the
alien abduction scenarios that have become so well known in popular culture.
And in the one scene in which government agents do in fact appear, Will blows
them off with a hilariously scathing accusation of human rights violations in
Africa. Will's relationship with his friends, most notably Chucky (Ben
Affleck), is usually rather amusing, if somewhat crude (the film has 100+ uses
of the 'f' word, which was most likely the reason for its R-rating), and lends
itself well to the development of Will's character. 
Add all this to the fact that "Good Will Hunting" even manages to pull off an
uplifting happy ending without getting excessively sentimental, and you might
be wondering why I haven't given this film four stars. Well, for one thing, no
matter how well Damon and Affleck, who wrote the screenplay, and director Gus
Van Sant pull it off, the story is still rather contrived and not particularly
original. There are also a few scenes that did feel a bit formulaic, including
one that was supposed to be emotional but really just seemed like the
Obligatory Crying Scene for any movie involving therapy sessions. Still, "Good
Will Hunting" takes its premise a lot farther than I thought it would, and is
definitely one of the better personal dramas I have seen in the last few
years, and as of right now it stands as one of the top five on my list of '97
films. 

Author
Scott Renshaw
     Of all the reasons I was pleasantly surprised by GOOD WILL HUNTING --
and there were several -- the easiest to identify was its subversive
awareness of its own genre.  The story of a troubled genius named Will
Hunting (Matt Damon) forced to work with emotionally wounded psychiatrist
Sean Maguire (Robin Williams) was ripe for the sort of cathartic
therapeutic hokum which has passed for emotional honesty in films like
ORDINARY PEOPLE or the recent BLISS.  I called long ago for a moratorium
on physician-heal-thyself psychiatrists as a cinematic type; therapy
sessions as revelatory contrivance seemed just as ready for mothballs.
     GOOD WILL HUNTING can't possibly steer clear of every pitfall
associated with therapy-centered drama, but it's conscious enough of those
pitfalls to provide a goofy sense of originality.  The script, by Damon
and his co-star and real-life buddy Affleck, keeps the dialogue between
Will and Sean generally smart and smart-alecky (particularly sharp was a
pastoral scene which Will describes as a "Taster's Choice moment between
the guys").  The arc of their relationship is convincing and patiently
developed, with Williams and Damon sharing an impressive chemistry.  In
fact, chemistry defines the cast from top to bottom -- Will's friendships
with his working-class chums, his romance with a British Harvard student
(Minnie Driver), and even Sean's contentious friendship with the MIT
professor (Stellan Skarsgaard) who envies Will's gift.  The performances
are consistently strong enough (even Robin Williams in his "bearded, ergo
serious" mode) to carry GOOD WILL HUNTING through its inevitable dips into
confrontation, as well as a running time which could have used a judicious
twenty minutes of trimming.
     Strongest of all is Damon himself in a dazzlingly charismatic piece
of screen acting.  Both believably brilliant and convincingly rough around
the edges, Damon avoids the too-common actor's trap of white-washing his
character's dark side.  That dubious distinction, unfortunately, goes to
director Gus Van Sant, who turns Will's primary surge of violence into a
slow-motion ballet, undercutting the character's pent-up rage.  It's too
conventional an instinct for a director who has rarely done anything the
conventional way, offering Damon a protection he simply doesn't need.  As
both actor and writer, Matt Damon gives GOOD WILL HUNTING energy, soul and
a welcome desire to avoid trite situations.  It's a rare drama which
satisfies without pandering, a feel-good, heal-good session which gives
you just a little hope that every trip to the couch doesn't have to be a
trip into Cliche-Land.

Author
Chris Loar
Directed by Gus Van Sant, Jr.
Starring Matt Damon (Will Hunting), Robin Williams (Sean McGuire),
Ben Affleck (Chuckie), Minnie Driver (Skylar)
Gus Van Sant is known for his quirky, bold, experimental features.
This film is a break with that tradition; what we've got in _Good Will
Hunting_ is a much slicker, more commercially viable film than I've
seen from him before.  In fact, he's made a film that could easily
have been hackneyed, we've seen it so many times -- the rebellious
youth tamed by his respect for an older, experienced man. Filmgoers
hoping for the verve and originality of _Drugstore Cowboy_ or My Own
Private Idaho_ will likely be disappointed.  But Van Sant proves with
this picture that he can do something more mainstream and palatable
with not just competence, but with a certain level of energy and
enthusiasm.  We have certainly seen this story before, but it's
been a while since we've seen it told this well.
Will Hunting (Matt Damon) is a walking contradiction.  A young tough guy
from the wrong side of Boston, he spends his days roaming the streets
with his buddies, looking for trouble.  His nights, though, are spent
reading history and philosophy, and taking time out from his job as a
janitor at MIT to solve math problems that baffle Nobel Laureates.  Will
is a math genius with an eidetic memory; he is also an angry young man
who is on his way to a prison term when he is discovered by a Lambeau, 
a brilliant mathematician (played passably by Stellan Skarsgard), who
secures Will's release, on the condition that the two of them work
together -- and that Will agrees to see a therapist.
This last point is tricky, since Will is uncooperative, defensive, and
too smart for his own good, and runs circles around every therapist
he's sent to until he winds up in the hands of Lambeau's old college
roommate, Sean McGuire.  Sean is a brilliant burnout, a Harvard grad
who teaches at a community college and mourns the loss of his dead
wife.  And, at this point, the therapy starts to go somewhere -- for
Sean is from South Boston himself, and understands that the only way
to make any progress with Will is to win his trust.  Williams gives
one of the best performances of his career here, as we watch him teach
Will how to approach his life, even as he himself starts to awaken to
his own failures and what he needs to do about them.
These scenes with Will and Sean are often simply riveting, and they
alone would provide a perfectly good reason to see the picture.
Williams and Damon are great foils for each other; they bring two very
different sorts of energy to these scenes.  Damon, while not
delivering the film's best performance, has a way of bringing out the
finest in his co-stars; Williams flags a bit when Damon's not
onscreen, while Minnie Driver (playing Syklar, Will's love interest)
and Ben Affleck (as Chuckie, Will's best friend) really shine when
they're playing off Damon.
The film has difficulty holding itself together at times; Affleck and
Damon's script just doesn't have room to tell us everything we'd like
to know about the major characters; Driver's and Affleck's characters
would come off as rather cardboard were the actors not so skilled at
painting character in a few deft brushstrokes.  And the film hardly
compares to Van Sant's best work; the direction and writing, while
more than competent, are hardly making us take a fresh look at what
cinema can do.
Taken on its own, however, the film is engrossing and, at times,
startlingly moving.  And it does something that most films of this
troubled-youth genre don't do: it emphasizes that the most important
thing a person can do is learn to think and feel independently.  Too
many stories ask us to believe that rebellious youth should learn to
play by the rules; this one tells us that we should all be rebels --
but need to learn how to break only those rules that lie between us
and what we want.  Damon, Affleck, and Van Sant are telling us that
the cure for the rebel without a cause is not to stop rebelling; it's
to teach that rebel what a cause is, and let them find it themselves.

Author
Michael Redman
Nearly everyone has  exceptional talents of some type and occasional sparks of
genius. It's rare that these skills are ever put to use because there are
thousands of reasons not to. It's so much easier to just keep on keepin' on in
the same old comfortable way.
Will Hunting (Matt Damon) enjoys nothing more than drinking and fighting with
his rowdy buddies from the poor Irish neighborhood of South Boston, but
there's a problem. He's secretly a mathematical genius. Working as a janitor
at MIT, he solves intricate formulas in minutes that took the professors
years. His life changes overnight when his ability is discovered by Professor
Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgard).
Lambeau catches up with him after Hunting has been arrested for assault. He
arranges a release on two conditions: the young man meet with the professor
once a week and also see a psychologist. The former is easy: Will wants to
learn. He isn't much interested in therapy though and burns through several
doctors who refuse to continue seeing him after one session.
As a last resort, the instructor takes him to Sean McGuire (Robin Williams), a
former college friend who now teaches at a junior college. Will and McGuire, a
fellow "Southie", make an instant connection. Both are damaged by their past
and paralyzed in the present. McGuire continues to carry the pain of his
beloved wife's death. Hunting can't get beyond his abusive childhood.
McGuire toils away at his thankless job, going nowhere. Hunting tells himself
that it is noble to continue in his old ways rather than explore possible
futures. Neither can get anywhere because they are more sheltered in the
familiar, as agonizing as it might be. Through their weekly encounters, each
pushes the other out of their complacency.
While Will is trying to decide just what it is he wants to do, he meets Skylar
(Minnie Driver), a Harvard student who steals his heart. Their relationship is
as tumultuous as that between him and McGuire. They fall in love, are filled
with doubts, fight, break up, almost get back together, break up, maybe get
back together...
Damon and Williams have heat in their scenes together. There's something
authentic happening as they challenge each other. As real as the interaction
between the genius and his therapist are, Will's changes don't ring completely
true. It does happen at times that a person thoroughly makes life alterations
as a result of treatment, but it's difficult to accept that it could all
happen so rapidly. McGuire's transformation seems more genuine.
Much more believable is the relationship between Will and Skylar. Director Gus
Van Sant ("My Own Private Idaho", "Even Cowgirls Get The Blues") captures
young love admirably. The intensity of their attractions and their hesitancies
are convincingly passionate. They aren't sure what they are doing and that's
the way that it really is.
Damon looks to be on the fast track towards becoming one of cinema's brightest
bad boys. He's a good looking guy who can look brooding with the best of them,
bringing to mind James Dean and the young Marlon Brando. That alone could
bring him several roles, but the fact that he has impressive acting skills
insure his longevity.
Robin Williams has two modes that he excels in. The first is the manic, no
holds barred wacky guy. The other is Sean McGuire. Similar to his characters
in "Dead Poet's Society" and "Awakenings", Williams plays the therapist with
humanistic depth. He's a human being with genuine emotions.
Ben Afflect ("Chasing Amy" and co-writer of this film along with Damon) is
Will's best friend Chuckie and steals the scenes that he's in. Off-screen
friends, their camaraderie translates to the movie.  Chuckie is a tough kid
complete with gold chains, and is in many ways the more colorful of the two.
As good as Damon is in the role, the film might have been even better with
Afflect as the lead.
The subtext of Bostonian classism is handled oddly. The message that manual
labor is virtuous but only for some people is a strange one. It's fine for
Chuckie to continue living in the old neighborhood and working all the
live-long day, but not for Will. This confuses the issue. Is Will embracing
his potential or betraying his roots? Not everyone can be saved, but is
Chuckie, as he claims, in fact living the fullest life he could? The film
tells us "yes", but well, maybe "no". Maybe those guys carrying bricks are
doing honest virtuous works. Or maybe they're just being told that so they
continue carrying bricks. The movie straddles the fence on the very issue it
attempts to address.
Will's situation at the end is a difficult one, much like real life. He is
forced to choose between his passion or his passion. It's a difficult
decision, but he makes the only one possible for a man who has awakened to
himself. Good for him.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 22 years and has yet to
decide which he believes was the best film of 97. Maybe he never will: stay
tuned. Redman@bvoice.com is one way to influence him.)
[This appeared in the 2/4/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Charles Henderson
I would nominate Good Will Hunting as one of the ten best films of 1997!
I do this in full recognition that the plot is overly simplistic and
predictable, a flaw certainly to be seized upon by other critics. One is
quite aware where this movie is heading from the moment we realize that
Will Hunting (Matt Demon) is a gifted young man from South Boston, with
a long police record and a penchant for getting into fights with his
drinking buddies. When he confronts an arrogant Harvard grad student in
a Cambridge bar, not with his fists, but with superior knowledge of U.S.
history, Will is up and running as our hero. During the same encounter
he meets a bright, beautiful, Harvard undergrad with a large trust fund,
named Skylar (Minnie Driver) and goes home with her telephone number in
his pocket. With such an obvious combination of talent and good looks,
aided and abetted with a tremendous sense of humor, its clear there's
nothing on earth that can stop him from triumphing over the wounds of a
seriously troubled childhood. Nor is there anything that will likely
stand in the way of Matt Damon as the movie industry's newest superstar!
His acting is superb! Despite the simplicity of the story-line, this
film is filled with wonderful actors, first of all Matt and Minne. They
are followed closely thereafter by Robin Williams as the down and out
psychology professor who becomes Will's counselor and friend. And Ben
Afflect, who with Matt, actually wrote the script and plays Will's best
friend, Chuckie, in the movie.
Then too, there's the directing of Gus Van Sant (Drugstore Cowboy; My
Own Private Idaho) and the cinematography of Jean Yves Escoffur. The
visual impact of this movie is very, very strong. In a few carefully
chosen shots and scenes we are given a realistic feel for the South
Boston neighborhoods where Will and his friends reside, for Cambridge
and the MIT campus, where much of the plot unfolds, and the
interconnecting subways, roadways, riverscapes and skyscapes that make
up greater Boston, which is the backdrop for this very American movie.
Of course it's very much part of America's civil religion to believe
that any young man (or woman) from South Boston (or the South Bronx, or
South L.A., or the South itself -- thank you Bill Clinton) can grow up
to be President of the United States. Since the glow and luster no
longer seem to reside with the Presidency, this film's hero promises to
become the Nobel prize winning mathematician who is smart enough and
honest enough to puncture the hypocrisy of corporate bigshots or
government bureaucrats, even as he gains the personal maturity required
to build real relationships with real people, and heal his own wounded
psyche. As this revision of the American Dream unfolds, there's lots and
lots of good music to listen to in a well rendered sound track, and
above all, a winning sense of humor balanced by an emotional punch that
kept me either laughing or crying during much of the film's hour and
twenty two minutes. What makes it all work, despite the flaw already
mentioned, is the coordination of the camera work, acting, and directing
that make the whole considerably greater than the sum of all its parts.
Leaving the theatre I was struck by the impression that we are living in
one of the greatest visual cultures ever. And while I realize that this
has its downside (namely, the corrosive effects of a growing
illiteracy), one might as well enjoy the visual treasures that movies
like this one truly are. When you realize that this movie was written by
two kids from South Boston (Damon and Affleck), and that these two
talented guys are in a position to receive Academy Award nominations
while still in their twenties, this movie is in more ways than one an
anthem in praise to America. One which is played with prophetic passion,
as well as a genuine love of country. Five flames.
Charles Henderson, Executive Director
The Association for Religion and Intellectual Life
For additional reviews visit our website at
http://christianity.miningco.com/library/weekly/blmovies.htm

Author
Edwin Jahiel
GOOD WILL HUNTING (1997) *** 1/2  Directed by Gus Van Sant. Written by Ben
Affleck & Matt Damon from a story by Damon. Editing, Pietro Scalia.
Production design, Melissa Stewart. Costume design, Beatrix Aruna Pasztor.
Music, Danny Elfman. Cast: Matt Damon (Will Hunting), Robin Williams (Sean
McGuire), Ben Affleck (Chuckie),Minnie Driver (Skylar), Stellan Skarsgard
(Lambeau), Casey Affleck (Morgan), Cole Hauser (Billy) et al . A Miramax
release. 126 minutes. R (language)
What makes a genius be a genius?  One clue in this film is that its hero
Will Hunting has a photographic memory to end all memories. But then, the
great philosopher Henri Bergson, whose works include the seminal "Matter
and Memory" (1896), used to say that "Memory is the intelligence of
imbeciles." So a one-in-a-gazillion case like Will's must ally memory and
stupendous intelligence. But what is intelligence of this caliber? Never
mind.
Will Hunting is a young, tough Southie (from working-class South Boston)
whose miserable childhood (genes are not mentioned) has led to verbal,
mental and physical aggressiveness outside his small circle of buddies.
Self-taught through gobbling up books in public libraries, Will is a genius
in mathematics, perhaps in other areas too.
One of his idiosyncrasies is refusing to join Establishments of any kind,
from universities to government.  (In a bar, there's a great, on-the-nose
scene that satirizes Academe and academics). Having opted for menial jobs,
he is currently a janitor at the prestigious M.I.T.  As he sweeps a hallway
he spots a problem posted by a famous mathematician, Professor Lambeau, a
major award-winner. The puzzle that defies the best graduate students and
their teachers too is solved by Wil in a jiffy.
Prof. Lambeau tracks down the mysterious and uncooperative savant.  As Will
is psychologically troubled, a street fracas leads him to court. His long
rap-sheet results in a $50,000 bond. The judge is talked into placing Will
in Lambeau's custody, for teaching and therapy. In a series of funny
vignettes, sundry psychologists give up on the young man. As a last resort
Lambeau enlists reluctant Sean McGuire (Robin Williams). The two men used
to be university classmates but fell out. Lambeau went on to glory, McGuire
to counseling and to teaching in a community college. The odd relations
between the two are among the film's strong points.
Defensive, aggressive and cynical at first, second, and third, Will slowly
relents, especially as he becomes aware that Sean is another wounded soul
-- in great part because the death of his wife devastated him. Patient and
analyst become good for each other and bond. Will's "cure" is also aided by
an affair with Brit (and Harvard medical student) Skylar (Minnie Driver).
The movie originated as a short story by Matt Damon, an assignment in
creative writing when he was at Harvard. Damon and childhood friend Ben
Affleck then joined forces to transform the story into a movie script.
Conceived as a thriller, the scenario evolved into a character-driven tale.
Its production took the writers through the usual odyssey of film projects.
Maverick Gus Van Sant, has now directed a movie with mainstream appeal and
predictable developments. But is the subject also of a mainstream nature?
Not really. It may create that impression but deep down its is original,
offbeat.
American films are like the USA itself. They are built on a grand scale far
more often than in other national cinemas. They deal with superlatives.
"Good Will Hunting" does not have the gigantism of  views, crowds, actions
or disasters, yet it fits the superlative label with Will's mind being
extra-extraordinary. Will is a Superman of the mind and the intellect,
which by itself makes the film a rarity, especially in the way it also
weaves in the intimate Will.
In acting, working parts and details the movie rises above deja vu yarns.
The rich dialogue runs from pungent to "intellectual" to touching as Will
gets "tamed" and Sean comes to terms with his own wounds. The process can
be slow in terms of screen time, but that's a necessity when you don't have
the characters magically undergo transformations with Hollywoodian
celerity.  It's all interesting and un-cliched, except in an
audience-courting bit in which Will abandons his last-ditch defensiveness
when he finds out that Sean too is a dedicated baseball fan. Yet even this
cliche is handled with originality. In plot development and spoken lines,
there's a great deal of first-rate writing here, by first-time writers too!
Robin Williams delivers a class A performance, with distant affinities to
that of "Dead Poets Society." Serious, touching yet humorous, he is lively
but not maniacal, frenzied or agitated, does not make with the jokes as
usual.  His portrayal is affecting, even memorable in many a scene. The one
of  his long speech  by the river is heart-rending.   Ranking four stars
for its moving eloquence about love, it is also a superb Valentine to his
dead wife.
Whether or not Damon has the great looks and sex-appeal often mentioned in
the press is not for me to judge, but as a performer he too is striking ,
complex and complicated. as in his relationships with Skylar and all
others. His longest speech is a socially-conscious mini-gem that gives his
reasons for not going to NASA.
Minnie Driver was last seen on the big screen as disc the delightful, kooky
disc-jockey Debi in "Grosse Pointe Blank." On the small screen she recently
appeared on the Jay Leno show -- wrongly and bustily dressed. She's back to
charming us in "GWH."
Swedish actor Skarsgard hits the bull's-eye as big-time mathematician
Lambeau, who is astounded, admirative, discreetly jealous and upset before
the genius of the street-kid prole.
The movie misses out on just one thing, its title. Not catchy, too cute,
making little sense, it sounds like a hunt for bargains at GoodWill
Industries.

Author
James Brundage
Will Hunting (new star Matt Damon, from Francis Ford Coppola's "The
Rainmaker") is the epitome of all of our hopes and dreams. A genius, a
charismatic guy, smart and funny. He's also the worst things in today's
society. An orphan, a victim of abuse, out of control, angry, rebellious. He
can solve math equations in his sleep that have baffled the professional
community for years. He also is haunted by abusive foster-parent after
abusive foster-parent.
Combine him with MIT's most brilliant mathematician, a burn-out psychologist
(Robin Williams), a pre-med student (Minnie Driver), and three of the most
over-the-top street boy kids that you can imagine, and you have a poignant,
funny, and touching story to tell.
"Good Will Hunting" is one of those films that leaves you with a smile in
the midst of one of the most brilliant and saddest stories this year.
Between brilliantly written characters and a story that makes sense for
once, with people in it that you can form definite connections to, the
result becomes near perfect. It resides now in my mind and in my heart, and
also occupies the #3 spot for best movies of the year (#1 is LA
Confidential, #2 is As Good as it Gets).
The movie is powered by the best original screenplay (quote me on that one,
Golden Globe and Oscar) of the year: a profanity-laced, smart-talking script
devised by Massachusetts natives Matt Damon and Ben Affleck, not to mention
the razor-sharp direction of the brilliant Gus Van Sant (Drugstore Cowboys,
To Die For). With this they draw you into the world of Will Hunting as he
struggles with his past, present, and future.
The film has Will Hunting proving one of the most devious theorems that the
Math Department of MIT has ever devised, and, in consequence, this proof
becomes his Get out of Jail Free card. One a condition: That he seek
counseling. He tries to screw around with the first few shrinks until one
from the same side of the tracks comes along (played by Robin Williams).
This man has high hopes for Will Hunting, as does everyone, but truly has a
desire to help the lost soul. What follows is a search for himself that you
will never forget.

Author
Steve Kong
We've all heard this story line before: Boy-wonder-genius is discovered and
is put to use by scientists.  Then the government finds out and puts the
boy-wonder to work for the government.  Something outrageous is discovered
by the boy as he works for the government and some bad guys come hunting
for the boy, trying to ax him.  All I have to say is: Thank goodness
writers/actors Matt Damon and Ben Affleck took a different approach.
Among its several connotations, the title includes the name of the main
character, Will Hunting (Matt Damon).  Will is a young man who has a
special gift for mathematics and other college level learning.  For him,
comprehending difficult theories is as easy as tying his shoelaces.  He can
read at impressive speeds and retain all of the knowledge after one
reading. By no means is Will like Dustin Hoffman's Rain Man; he is a normal
guy with an abnormal talent. He works as a janitor at MIT, and while
cleaning the floors one night, he solves a difficult proof posted on a
chalkboard and catches the attention of a hardworking professor, Lambeua
(Stellan Skarsgĺrd).  Will is thrown in jail after a scuffle with some
punks and Lambeaua sees this as an opportunity to help Will out.  Lambeaua
agrees to get Will out of jail if he will study math with Lambeaua and get
some therapy.  
After driving away a few therapists with his mind games, Will meets one
that can help him.  Sean McGuire (Robin Williams) is from the same part of
town and is never turned away by Will's horrible behavior. The problem with
Will is that he has a lot of talent but he is squandering it by being a
punk and turning down "real world" ideas.  Both Lambeua and McGuire see
this and both want to help Will out.  
Along the way a relationship starts between Will and Skylar (Minnie
Driver).  Although it has meaning within the movie, it seems somewhat
shallow and I would have liked to see the relationship developed more.  We
also get to meet Will's friends, including his best friend, Chuckie (Ben
Affleck). Like the love relationship, the friendships in the film seem
underdeveloped and shallow.
Those are small complaints, though, because the script works well in
tugging at our emotions. The most important relationship is the one between
Will and Sean, his therapist. And it is in this relationship that we find
out why Will is way that he is. We also see that Sean is being helped by Will.
All performances in Good Will Hunting are top-notch.  Matt Damon is on a
roll, first with his starring role in Francis Ford Coppola's The Rainmaker,
and now with his lead role in Good Will Hunting. I can't wait to see what
he's going to do next.  Robin Williams also gives a wonderful performance.
His Professor McGuire is a man with a hard past and Williams is able to get
that across on screen. (I'm also glad to see Williams in a good movie
instead of movies like Flubber and Father's Day.) 
The script by Damon and Affleck milks each and every scene for emotion,
whether a laugh or a tear. In that aspect the script works very well.
Sometimes it feels corny, but it's never bad enough to ruin the film.  Gus
Van Sant Jr., the director, does a wonderful job keeping up the pace.
Worth mentioning is the acoustic and intimate score by Danny Elfman, which
is surprisingly different from his other works. It sounds more like a tame
version of the Midnight Run music than it does his more grand scores, like
Batman.  But, like in all his other films, Elfman never allows the score to
overshadow what is happening on screen.
Good Will Hunting is a great film.  The theme (If you have talent, don't
waste it), comes very close to being inspiring.  The film is definitely a
tear-jerker though.  Don't Miss Good Will Hunting on the big screen.  After
seeing the film, let me know what the title means to you.

Author
Jamie Peck
Miramax / 2:06 / 1997 / R 
Cast: Matt Damon; Robin Williams; Minnie Driver; Ben Affleck; 
Stellan Skarsgĺrd; Casey Affleck; Cole Hauser 
Director: Gus Van Sant 
Screenplay: Ben Affleck; Matt Damon 
Just in time for the holidays comes "Good Will Hunting," a 
well-cast drama intent on delivering that warm-and-gooey feeling, 
so much that it's a surprise to learn this wannabe-uplifter comes 
from usually-dark director Gus Van Sant. A December 25th release 
date actually couldn't be more appropriate, because this movie is 
so much like the big Christmas dinner you'll be downing on that day 
-- it certainly looks appetizing, but it'll leave you overstuffed, 
even ending with a send-off so drawn out that it's the cinematic 
equivalent of L-tryptophan. 
Good's icky title refers to its main character -- Will Hunting 
(Matt Damon), a janitor at the Massachusetts Institute of 
Technology. Will's secretly much brighter than most of the students 
attending there; said attribute is revealed after esteemed 
Professor Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgĺrd from "Breaking the Waves") 
posts a too-tough math problem on a blackboard for his students to 
solve, and only Will is bright enough to crack the answer. 
Initially, Will and Lambeau are rivals, but the latter comes to the 
former's aid after the young ruffian is jailed on an 
all-too-frequent assault charge. 
Lambeau has a couple conditions for keeping Will on the streets: 
One, they work side by side on math theory; two, Will see a 
psychiatrist on a regular basis. After several unsuccessful 
pairings, a spark is ignited with unorthodox therapist Sean McGuire 
(Robin Williams), an old friend of Lambeau's. Will's time is then 
divided between being helped by McGuire and hanging out with his 
old Boston buddies, namely best pal Chuckie (immensely likeable Ben 
Affleck from "Chasing Amy"). There's also time for a romantic 
subplot involving Skylar (Minnie Driver), a beautiful, brainy 
Harvard student who falls for Will. 
Van Sant, who last directed the explosive media satire "To Die 
For," keeps things moving in a conventional way. The movie bears 
none of his eccentric trademarks; just when you think things are 
about to get engaging, they stay steady with disinteresting 
development. The screenplay, co-written by Damon and Affleck, is 
pretty standard; they know how to create compelling characters but 
don't do much compelling with them. At best, "Good Will Hunting" is 
watchable, but it's rarely moving or sentimental. 
If the heart of "Good Will Hunting" is the relationship between 
Will and McGuire, then it's a shockingly empty one. Their first few 
sessions, as they begin challenging each other's minds, hold 
promise, but future interaction is formulaic, predictable and 
uninvolving. Far better is the screen time devoted to Will with 
Skylar and Chuckie. There might be a better movie there, but the 
problem is that this development is secondary to Will's therapeutic 
process. Damon and Affleck are close friends in real life, and 
their chemistry is apparent, adding much potency to scenes that 
aren't very important. Driver, as she did in last April's "Grosse 
Pointe Blank," turns what could have been a throwaway role into 
something special; I found her scenes with Damon to be far more 
concentrated than anything else in the film. 
Because "Good Will Hunting" is a performance-driven piece, I can 
recommend it. There's an abundance of good acting here, including 
Williams scoring big with an atypically serious role; he does that 
goofy shtick so often (most recently in tripe like "Flubber" and 
"Fathers' Day") that it's easy to forget what a good dramatic 
player he is. It's just that there's little emotional investment 
made in the story. When "Good Will Hunting" stacks on a plethora of 
stirring climactic events, it's akin to going to a party where you 
don't know anyone and something disastrous happens -- you really 
just don't care. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1

Author
Jason Cline
     Every once in a while you see a film that is so effective in
delivering the goods that it is easy to forget, and forgive, its glaring
imperfections.  Such is the case with łGood Will Hunting˛, a subtle
character study about a socially inept mathematics genius who struggles to
find his path in life.  Despite some serious character problems, this is
still a very good film.
     You probably know about the plot so Išll make it quick.  Will Hunting
(Damon) is a janitor at M.I.T., hešs really smarter than Einstein but
nobody knows it.  He likes to go out with his friend Chuckie (Affleck) and
their other working-class buddies and drink beer.  Hešs good-looking,
charismatic, and witty but has a terrible time with authority and stiff
college folk.  After getting into a tiff with the law, a distinguished
professor (Skarsgĺrd) discovers Willšs genius and offers him a chance to
clean up his record and avoid jail time, at a price:  He must attend weekly
sessions with a therapist and work on various mathematical problems (that
have stumped the academic elite) with the professor.  After outsmarting and
scaring the hell out of a couple of different psychologists he meets his
match when hooked up with a once-promising therapist named Sean Maguire
(Williams) who has his own problems.  In the meantime Will meets a British
medical school student (Driver) and they begin to fall in love.
     The story starts out well enough and is a pretty original basis for a
film.  Even though wešve seen movies about misunderstood, erratic prodigies
before (łShine˛ ring a bell?), the script here creates a complex narrative
that doesnšt just focus solely on one character.
     Alas though, this is not a perfect film, as much as you feel like it
couldšve been while watching it.  The one real problem I had with it is the
unrealistic nature of the main character.  Is it possible for a lowly
janitor to be this intelligent? Of course.  Is it possible for him to be
estranged from any deep, human relationships?  Usually, yes.  But, is it
possible for him to also be so handsome, funny, quick with the tongue, and
city-street tough?  Not very likely.  Come on, usually these guys are total
nerds who canšt even buy their own shirts, much less talk down a Harvard
student in a hip pub while picking up phone numbers from pretty med.-school
girls.  Will is just a little too perfect, and in order to accept the
character your disbelief suspension needs to be in excellent working
condition.  The heavy-handed, anti-war statement made by Will at a
government job interview late in the film is also boorish, overlong,
pompous, and completely unnecessary.  All this sounds pretty  bad, but the
film somehow makes up for it in other ways.  Damonšs acting overshadows the
fact that the character is slightly unbelievable, his performance is truly
extraordinary.
     Which leads me to the really good part of the review.  The strength of
this movie can be summed up in one single word: acting.  I canšt recall
seeing a film recently that was so well-acted from top to bottom.  From
Minnie Driveršs frustrated lover to Ben Affleckšs laid-back best friend,
and all the small roles in between, the performances are magnificent. 
Robin Williamsš skill is a given as a bereaved psychologist who couldšve
had a legendary career but was knocked off the path somewhere down the
line.  The real gem though is Stellan Skarsgĺrdšs turn as Professor
Lambeau, an award-winning mathematician who feels reduced in comparison to
a younger, smarter Will Hunting.  The scenes between Williams and
Skarsgĺrd, as two old college pals whošve been brought back together by
this enigmatic kid, display some of the best acting Išve ever seen.  When I
say delivering the goods, this is what Išm talking about.  Watching these
two work is what going to see movies is all about.
     Gus Van Santšs (To Die For, Drugstore Cowboy) cold, urban direction is
right on, as well as Danny Elfmanšs sauntering musical score.  I highly
recommend łGood Will Hunting˛.  Despite its faults, it is still an
intriguing and fascinating film and you are not likely to see a better
acted one this year.

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Matt Damon, Robin Williams, Ben Affleck, Stellan Skarsgard, 
      Minnie Driver, Casey Affleck, Cole Hauser
Director: Gus Van Sant
Producer: Lawrence Bender
Screenplay: Matt Damon and Ben Affleck
Cinematography: Jean-Yves Escoffier
Music: Danny Elfman
U.S. Distributor: Miramax Films
     In essence, GOOD WILL HUNTING is an ordinary story told well.  
Taken as a whole, there's little that's special about this tale -- it 
follows a traditional narrative path, leaves the audience with a warm, 
fuzzy feeling, and never really challenges or surprises us.  But it's 
intelligently written (with dialogue that is occasionally brilliant), 
strongly directed, and nicely acted.  So, while GOOD WILL HUNTING is far 
from a late-year masterpiece, it's a worthwhile sample of entertainment.
     Like SCENT OF A WOMAN, which was released around this time of the 
season five years ago, GOOD WILL HUNTING is about the unlikely 
friendship that develops between a world-weary veteran and a cocky young 
man.  The formula for the two films is similar -- both of the principals 
learn from each other as they slowly break down their barriers on the 
way to a better understanding of life and their place in it -- but the 
characters are different.  Al Pacino's Slade was a larger-than-life 
individual; Robin Williams' Sean McGuire is much more subtle.  And Matt 
Damon's Will Hunting uses pugnaciousness to supplant the blandness of 
Chris O'Donnell's Charlie.  
     Will is a troubled individual.  As a child, he was the frequent 
victim of abuse.  An orphan, he was in and out of foster homes on a 
regular basis.  Now, not yet 21 years old, he has accumulated an 
impressive rap sheet.  He has a short temper and any little incident can 
set him off like a spark in a tinder box.  But he's a mathematical 
genius with a photographic memory and the ability to conceive simple 
solutions to complex problems.  While working as a janitor at MIT, he 
delights in anonymously proving theorems on the math building's hall 
blackboards.  Then, one evening, his anonymity is shattered when 
Professor Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgard) catches him at work.  Will flees, 
but Lambeau tracks him down.  Unfortunately, by the time the professor 
finds him, Will is in jail for assaulting a police offer.
     The judge agrees to release Will under two conditions:  that he 
spend one day a week meeting with Lambeau and that he spend one day a 
week meeting with a therapist.  Eventually, once several psychologists 
have rejected the belligerent young man, Sean McGuire, a teacher at 
Bunker Hill Community College, agrees to take the case.  After a rocky 
start, the two form a rapport and Will begins to explore issues and 
emotions he had walled up behind impregnable armor.  And, as Will 
advances his self-awareness in sessions with Sean, he also learns about 
friendship from his buddy, Chuckie (Ben Affleck), and love from a 
Harvard co-ed named Skylar (Minnie Driver).
     The script, by co-stars Matt Damon and Ben Affleck, is not a 
groundbreaking piece of literature, and occasionally resorts to 
shameless manipulation.  The characters are well-developed, however, and 
there are times when the dialogue positively sparkles.  At one point, 
Will comments that a session with Sean is turning into a "Taster's 
Choice Moment."  Later, Will gives a brilliant, breathless diatribe 
against the NSA that has the rhythm of something written by Kevin Smith.  
(Note:  Since Smith co-executive produced GOOD WILL HUNTING, it's not 
out of the question that he had some input into this scene.)
     Director Gus Van Sant (DRUGSTORE COWBOY, TO DIE FOR) culls genuine 
emotion from his actors, and this results in several affecting and 
powerful scenes.  There's an edginess to some of the Sean/Will therapy 
sessions, and the offscreen chemistry between Matt Damon and Minnie 
Driver (who became romantically linked while making this film) 
translates effectively to the movie -- the Will/Skylar relationship is 
electric.  Likewise, the companionability of Damon and Affleck is 
apparent in the easygoing nature of Will and Chuckie's friendship.  Many 
of the individual scenes are strong enough to earn GOOD WILL HUNTING a 
recommendation, even if the overall story is somewhat generic.
     Matt Damon, who recently starred as the idealistic young lawyer in 
THE RAINMAKER, is solid (although not spectacular) as Will.  Minnie 
Driver (last seen in GROSSE POINTE BLANK) adds another strong 
performance to a growing resume (and it's refreshing that she was 
allowed to keep her British accent rather than having to attempt an 
American one).  The outstanding performance of the film belongs to Robin 
Williams, whose Sean is sad and wise, funny and somber.  Arguably the 
best dramatic work in the actor's career (alongside what he did in THE 
FISHER KING), Williams' portrayal could earn him a Best Supporting Actor 
Oscar nomination.  Adequate support is provided by Ben Affleck (CHASING 
AMY) and Stellan Skarsgard (BREAKING THE WAVES).
     Like most of what comes before it, the ending of GOOD WILL HUNTING 
is completely predictable.  But meeting expectations and following a 
familiar path aren't always bad things in a movie, provided the film 
accomplishes those goals with a modicum of style and an attention to 
detail.  GOOD WILL HUNTING does both, and, as a result, earns a rating 
commensurate with the "good" in the title.
Now with more than 1300 reviews...
The ReelViews web site: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"No art passes our conscience in the way film does, and goes directly to our
feelings, deep down into the dark rooms of our souls"

Author
Marty Mapes
***1/2 (out of 4) Will Hunting (Matt Damon) is a natural genius. For a movie
character, that's usually a death sentence. It's a trait associated with
what my brother calls "too good for this world" movies, like PHENOMENON or
POWDER. 
Forgive me for spoiling the ending, but Will doesn't die. 
This is no formula movie. In fact, it's quite fresh and original. It's a
character study more than anything, and that's not surprising, considering
it was written by two actors: Damon and co-star Ben Affleck. 
Will works whatever kind of job he can get. First he's a janitor, then he
works construction. Off-screen he speed reads books on any academic subject
that interests him. On-screen he hangs out with his friends, picking fights
in robust, romanticized-Hemingway fashion. 
Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgard from BREAKING THE WAVES), a math professor,
learns that the janitor (Will) is a genius with a special talent for
advanced mathematics. Having confirmed he's not a fluke or a savant, he does
what he can to get Will into the education system. He is firmly rejected. 
Finally, Will lands in jail for one of his fights. Lambeau can get him
probation instead of prison time as long as Will agrees to therapy sessions
and to discussing mathematics with him. Will (barely) decides to go for the
therapy over prison. 
Lambeau treats Will like a son. He's proud of, and amazed by, Will's
accomplishments in mathematics. He encourages Will and tries to give him
structure, knowing that, with a little discipline, he could be bigger than
Einstein. Will isn't really interested in academia. He knows he would be the
best in his field, and therefore spend all of his time in an office,
explaining math to people like Lambeau. He would rather work construction,
which breaks Lambeau's heart.  
Meanwhile, Will attends his mandated therapy sessions. It's not long before
he shreds all the therapists on Lambeau's "A" list. Will has read enough
psychology to know the tricks of the trade, and how to keep them from
affecting him. Shrink after shrink refuses to return after Will's mockery. 
Lambeau's last hope is his old college roommate, now a psychology teacher at
a small-time community college. Knowing that Will is going to try to shred
him too, Sean (Robin Williams) agrees to take him on as a favor to Lambeau
and for the chance to meet this next Einstein. 
True to form, Will finds Sean's emotional weakness and attacks. But unlike
the other shrinks, Sean knows what he is in for and continues the sessions.
Like a foster mother with a fussy child, Sean knows that the attacks are
defensive and is able to take them in stride. Like the foster mother, Sean
knows that time and quiet patience is the only approach. 
Robin Williams is excellent in this role. He's not an actor with a great
range, but in the right roles he has great depth. In this movie, as in
AWAKENINGS, there comes a point when the quiet, shy man accomplishes
something of great personal importance, and a smile of pure joy spreads up
to his eyes. Williams is the only actor I can name who can make an audience
cry just by smiling. 
I have compared Will to a foster child and that's not entirely fair.
Emotionally, he has a lot to learn, but he is not a child. He has thought
about his life and made rational decisions about what he wants. Sean, his
girlfriend, his pals, and Lambeau all help him grow, but he didn't start out
asking for, or particularly needing, help. His exceptional gift singled him
out, and those who love him kept pushing him in the right direction. 
If I had to say anything bad about GOOD WILL HUNTING is that it walks the
line between drama and melodrama. It's too sentimental and uplifiting for a
straight drama, but the emotions are too subtle for melodrama. It is
emotionally engaging, but it's not quite larger than life. This isn't a
problem PER SE, but at times I didn't know quite how to take it. But this is
a relatively small complaint about a very good movie. 
A good movie allows its characters to learn and grow. It doesn't just
happen; it takes a good script, good acting, and good direction. GOOD WILL
HUNTING has all three. If you are at all inclined to see it, by all means, go.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Walter Frith
Written by Matt Damon and his best friend Ben Affleck, who also appears 
in the film as Damon's best friend, 'Good Will Hunting' was created on 
paper before the two of them were struggling to break into show business, 
growing up in South Boston and setting their own goals.  For Damon, it's 
a smart move, much in the same approach that Billy Bob Thornton took 
in 1996 as he wrote the screenplay to 'Sling Blade', and adapted it for 
the big screen as an independent film and Thornton had the starring
role.
Beginning at MIT (The Massachusetts Institute of Technology), 'Good Will
Hunting' begins with a math professor (Stellan Skarsgard), who gives a 
complex math problem to his class and offers an incentive to the first
one 
that can solve it.  It took the professor two and a half years to solve
it so
what a challenge for his students!  He writes the problem on the
blackboard 
outside the classroom and later a janitor in the building (Matt Damon)
solves 
the problem almost without thinking about it.  This really isn't work
for 
him but being a janitor is and he resists attempts at developing his
gift of mathematical brain power.
Damon later gets arrested for assault and the judge agrees to release
him to the care of the professor who arranges for several court ordered
tasks to be performed as part of an agreement to keep Damon out of jail
and he has Damon introduced to a therapist, (Robin Williams) and Damon
meets his match in this clever and eager elder who wants to help Damon
find his true inner self.
There are many observations one can make after viewing 'Good Will
Hunting'.  The most acute observation that will probably be made by most
is that it tells the story of an ordinary young man with extraordinary
abilities.  Although most of us can't identify with his genius for
solving mathematical problems, we can identify with the relationship he
has with his friends, his elders and the lady in his life (Minnie
Driver).  This is the most uplifting film I've seen since 1989's 'My
Left Foot'
and 'Good Will Hunting' leaps off the pages of its script and unfolds
like a 
play with a simple look, a complex set of characters and a desire to do 
what films of this type should always do, educate and enlighten.  It
also has brilliantly coherent dialogue and a story of many personal
bondings 
that will make movie audiences feel better about themselves when they 
leave the theatre.
The performances all around are nothing short of miraculous guided by 
the surprisingly inspired direction of Gus Van Sant ('My Own Private 
Idaho', 'Drugstore Cowboy', 'To Die For') who makes the entire film
bright with flashes of real life characters brought to the point of not
only 
becoming better people by the end of the film but Van Sant was able to
keep everyone on their mark by following his direction exactly.  This is
evident by the completely humourless performance by Robin Williams who
doesn't
inject one funny moment in his usual witty and manic style of comedy and
its
the best film role Robin Williams has ever had.  Even in two of his
three
Oscar nominated roles, 'Dead Poet Society' and 'The Fisher King',
Williams
still injected moments of unexpected humour but there is none contained
in
'Good Will Hunting' and it is a refreshing breath of air as Williams
finally
begins to explore his true potential. 
'Good Will Hunting' has a ring of Oscar potential to it but more
importantly 
than that, it really can provide lessons in helping people sort out
their 
lives with only one viewing. 
http://home.netinc.ca/wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Fernando Vallejo
 A Miramax Pictures release. Starring Robin Williams, Matt Damon, Ben Affleck,
Stellan Skarsgard, Minnie Driver, Casey Affleck, Cole Hauser, George Plimpton.
Script by Ben Affleck and Matt Damon. Produced by Lawrence Bender. Directed by
Gus Van Sant. Running Time: 125 mins. Rated R.
"Good Will Hunting" is two movies in one: an independent take on the struggle
of four Boston pals and a traditional Hollywood, "prodigy child" film complete
with upbeats, downfalls, sporadically moving situations and plenty, plenty of
shtick.
 Unusually directed by Gus Van Sant, "Good Will Hunting"  overcomes the
banalities of its story by affirming the emergence of fresh, new talent. The
film stars Matt Damon as Will Hunting as a mathematical, rebellious whiz kid
inadvertly discovered by a college professor ( Stellan Skarsgard ), who places
him under psychological supervision with Robin Williams. In a nutshell, that's
it.
The core of the "Good Will Hunting" is Damon, who infuses the script ( co-
written by "Chasing Amy's" Ben Affleck ) with just the right amount of warmth,
sensitivity and humanity to accentuate his position as a refreshing multi-
talented performer. But it's the acting that hits the mark, and Damon hits all
the right notes, flying over Robin Williams' deja-vu role ("Awakenings" was
written all over this ) as a devastated shrink who has closed all contact with
society due to his wife's tragic death. Damon effortlessly blends the
carelesness of a gregarious, confused thug with the absorbing ingeniousness of
someone like Einstein. His rich, complex character is the pulp of "Good Will
Hunting." Everything else pales in comparison.
 "Good Will Hunting" exposes the lack of profoundness of deliberately
schmaltzy storytelling, but, unlike "Little Man Tate" or "Phenomenon", it
doesn't set up its story in a black and white, point A to point B be manner,
but as the saga of an extraordinary individual whose feasibility for success
doesn't automatically signify he must make easy, familiar choices, like the
protagonists in the aforementioned. 

Author
Cheng-Jih Chen

The basic story of "Good Will Hunting" is that of a Boston townie, a
20-year-old blue collar guy too cutely named Will Hunting (or is the
movie too cutely titled?), who, while sweeping the corridors of MIT,
happens to solve graduate-level math problems when no one is looking.
He's apparently better than the MIT professors, including the resident
Fields Medalist (read: Nobel Prize in mathematics).  He plays a sort of
mathematician's elf, who builds intricate and subtle theorems at night.
Will Hunting is not an idiot-savant.  He's actually an autodidact who
happens to be brilliant at sciences, at math in particular.  He also
has an asshole personality, you know, the type that's been made heroic
in movies over the years.  The young brilliant rebel thing, who has
social problems and a long rap sheet.
He's eventually discovered by the Fields Medalist, and, in a deal with
the court to get Will out of jail time for assaulting a cop, the MIT
professor takes him under his wing.  They'll solve math problems
together.  Our prodigy also has to seek counsoling.  The counsoling
psychiatrist turns out to be Robin Williams, in a role somewhat
reminiscent of the Oliver Sacks one in "Awakenings" and the Fisher King
in that Holy Grail movie.  Williams is good in this, by the way.
In any case, the movie annoyed the hell out of me until we began the
psychiatric sessions and the meat of the story, mainly because this
story of the unrecognized genius solving math problems that
professional mathematicians can't do is an old urban legend, derived
from the true story of how George Danzing came up with the simplex
method as a grad student in Berkeley.  It was also doing the math in an
annoying way, even though I haven't really touched the subject in many,
many years.  Complex proofs apparently can be stated on a single
blackboard panel, deep theorems and their proofs, beyond the
understanding of a Fields Medalist, can be described on a single sheet
of loose leaf, and so on.  Movies, to be effective, have to make you
suspend belief, and, sometimes, little things will shatter this
suspension for some people.  For New Yorkers, a scene of characters
walking instantly from Zabar's to the Met will do this.  For me, in the
first part of this film, it was this reference to the urban legend,
because I know how badly the legend is phrased, and because I dropped
out of math grad school with my inferior parietal lobe somewhat worse
for wear. [1]
Actually, another thing I find interesting is the movie's portrayal of
intellectuals.  This falls back to the old American distrust of
intellectuals -- the two most prominent ones in the film, the somewhat
effete, scarf-wearing Fields Medalist and this Harvard history grad
student in some bar hitting on Minnie Driver -- are both thoroughly
trounced, both subtly and obviously, by the Southie Will Hunting.  He's
better than them, morally, intellectually, physically.  As said, it
pushes those buttons in the American psyche.  As a side note, one of my
math professors wore a scarf just like the Field Medalist's, but he was
French, and, as an American, I just classified that habit as a French
thing.
Anyway, after this first part was out of the way, I actually liked the
film a lot.  The interactions between Robin Williams and the boy are
well written, well acted.  The same between the boy and his love
interest.  It's good movie making.  The general story is what you'd
expect in this sort of situation -- redemption, forgiveness, and so on
until a tear-filled catharsis followed by going after the girl -- but
the film handles it well.  It's a good movie, highly recommended.
One nice thing, showing the screenwriters' Harvard heritage: the neat,
non-explicit Bostonisms, mainly the ubiquitous presence of Dunkin'
Donut coffee cups and Au Bon Pain.  The townies also have a strong
Boston accent which I actually find harder to understand than, say,
Mimmie Driver's British accent, and they talk about the Red Sox like
it's an old-time religion.
While math is not the primary focus of the film, I found the way
it was used interesting, though perhaps not unexpected.  Basically,
we see only a dense wall of symbols and notation, a veritable foreign
language without a Rosetta Stone for the audience, followed by a QED.
For all intents and purposes, Will Hunting could have been writing in
Sanskrit with little difference.  Math, however, can inspire the fear
of god in people, while Sanskrit probably doesn't.  
So, with the various genius movies in the past few years, the majority
have been with music ("Shine", "Amadeus", and maybe one or two others),
chess ("Searching for Bobby Fisher"), and just general genius ("Little
Man Tate").  As said, there's surprisingly not a single math genius in
there (with the possible exception of "Relativity", the Richard Feynman
film, though that had more to do with Feynman and his wife, and not
Feynman's brilliant physics), despite math's higher intimidation
factor, its particular mysteriousness.  The only other thing I remember
that used a math genius was the Tom Stoppard play, "Arcadia" (and it
was used evocatively).
But this isn't that relevant.  The movie, in the end, is about a
troubled youth that just happens to be a prodigy.  It's that genre,
rather than the genius genre.  Well, geniuses, I think, tend to be
depicted as troubled in one way or another, and the movies tend to
focus on them reconciling these troubles, so that doesn't say much --
I'm not sure if there is a "genius" genre.  Except for "Amadeus",
actually, which was about a lesser light reacting to genius.  Now, that
was a good film.  Actually, same for "Arcadia", the Stoppard play,
which is about other people's reaction to genius.  Actually, I'm not
sure what my point is here.  Ignore me.
I recently finished a little book on Fermat's Last Theorem.  That book,
far more than this film, almost made me pull down my old Herstein's
"Topics in Algebra" from my bookshelf (Lang's "Algebra" is too
intimidating).  There's a vague desire to see Galois Theory again, in
the old, very particular sense of "see".  But this is perhaps just
nostalgia, brought on by the book's chatter on fields and abelian
groups.
[1] That's the substance of the UL that seems to be based in George Danzig:
A professor talks about "impossible" math problems in class, and puts a
few up on the board as examples.  Undergrad gets into class late,
thinks the problems on the board is homework, goes home, complains that
they were really hard but solves them.
The moral of the UL is the usual one about not thinking things are
"impossible", and that sometimes the student is smarter than the
teacher.  There's a positive thinking thing going on, as well as the
Biblical one, the "from the mouths of babes" thing.
The real story about Danzig is that he was a grad student -- and so a
different kettle of fish altogether -- and the professor was putting
some open problems on the board.  Open problems are very different from
"impossible" problems.
Actually (falling into math folklore), there's a legend apparently told
by Danzig that I heard second or third hand from professors.  It's a
von Neumann story, actually, and perhaps belongs in that subgenre.
This is after Danzig got his PhD, and is doing postdoc work at
Princeton.  Von Neumann is there, and Danzig goes up to him to describe
the simplex method.  So Danzig is up at the board, writing things down,
and after a really short amount of time (the length apparently
decreases with each retelling by Danzig), von Neumann gets up and says,
"oh, that", sits Danzig down, and proceeds to describe a number of
implications of the method.  The moral is that von Neumann, after
working on game theory for all those years, basically had the ideas of
the simplex method swimming around the back of his head, not quite
formalized.  A simpler moral: von Neumann is god.
